Pierre felt sad at hearing them making fun of him. 
How sad that his smile was so rare.  
Have you brought me sad news, Colonel?
"There now, we're sad," said he, touching Pierre's hand.
It was real sad how Annie ended up.
Teacher is sad, and let her feel the grieved expression on my face.
No. But it's so sad reading about it.
I so hope you will sweep me off my feet and take me away from my sad, lonely life straight to fairy-tale land.
Yes, Mamma, I tell you sincerely that these are hard and sad times for every Russian.
Natasha gave herself up so fully and frankly to this new feeling that she did not try to hide the fact that she was no longer sad, but bright and cheerful.
In the Petersburg world this sad side of the affair again involuntarily centered round a single incident: Kutaysov's death.
Poor people were not happy for their hearts were full of sad thoughts because they did not know much about America.
I was very, very sad to part with all of my friends in Boston, but I was so eager to see my baby sister I could hardly wait for the train to take me home.
Annie was a very sad and troubled woman, Donnie.
What a sad and tragic life poor Annie led.
I basically raised Katie from the time she was ten, she said, a sad look crossing her features.
139° gaining a practical solution of the problem of the destination of the westward-flowing rivers, Sir Thomas Mitchell, in 1833, led an expedition northward to the upper branches of the Darling; the party met with a sad disaster in the death of Richard Cunningham, brother of the eminent botanist, who was murdered by the blacks near the Bogan river.
"And dreadfully tough," added the Hungry Tiger, in a sad voice.
 ...so, although he grieved over the piglet's sad fate as much as any of them, he resolved to save Eureka's life.
A stream flowing into a hollow will tend to fill it up, and Lake s sad the water will begin to escape as soon as its level rises high Interna l enough to reach the lowest part of the rim.
"But you can't have understood me," said Princess Mary with a sad smile.
This is a sad time to see you. 
Gilgamesh, recalling to the goddess the sad fate of those who fall a victim to her charms, rejects the offer.
In the 12th tablet Gilgamesh succeeds in obtaining a view of Eabani's shade, and learns through him of the sad fate endured by the dead.
"Well then, take me and execute me!" he went on, speaking to himself and bowing his head with a sad but firm expression.
She likes stories that make her cry--I think we all do, it's so nice to feel sad when you've nothing particular to be sad about.
Her little brown mate has flown away with the other birds; but Annie is not sad, for she likes to stay with me.
It is impossible for any one with whom Helen is conversing to be particularly happy or sad, and withhold the knowledge of this fact from her.
Florence is very sad in big hole.
This morning I took a bath, and when teacher came upstairs to comb my hair she told me some very sad news which made me unhappy all day.
A medallion of Homer hangs on the wall of my study, conveniently low, so that I can easily reach it and touch the beautiful, sad face with loving reverence.
But the angel of forgetfulness has gathered up and carried away much of the misery and all the bitterness of those sad days. 
I must tell you, mon cher," he continued in the sad and measured tones of a man who intends to tell a long story, "that our name is one of the most ancient in France."
But I told her that my heart was sad, and I didn't feel like eating.
Cece Baldwin rose to leave and smiled a sad but pretty smile.
"I won't be sad," she said. 
The goddess Irnina (a form of Ishtar, q.v.) in revenge kills Eabani, and the balance of the epic is taken up with Gilgamesh's lament for his friend, his wanderings in quest of a remote ancestor, Ut-Napishtim, from whom he hopes to learn how he may escape the fate of Eabani, and his finally learning from his friend of the sad fate in store for all mortals except the favourites of the god, like Ut-Napishtim, to whom immortal life is vouchsafed as a special boon. 
I know he wasn't real sad when Mr. Shipton fell but now that his real father is around, he isn't as scared as he was. 
Better he should think it was a sad memory than to think she was afraid of ghosts.
"The Emperor," Pierre repeated, and his face suddenly became sad and embarrassed, "is the Emperor...?" 
And he fell back into that artificial realm of imaginary greatness, and again--as a horse walking a treadmill thinks it is doing something for itself--he submissively fulfilled the cruel, sad, gloomy, and inhuman role predestined for him.
"Very sad, sire," replied Michaud, lowering his eyes with a sigh.
There is a vein of sadness: the flux of all things, the vanity of life, are thoughts which perpetually recur, along with resignation to the will of God and forbearance towards others, and the religious longing to be rid of the burden and to depart to God. 
Mary was odious to her Protestant subjects, Elizabeth to those of the unreformed religion, and both these queens succeeded to the crown in times of general sadness; but the youthful Queen Victoria had no enemies except a few Chartists, and the land was peaceful and prosperous when she began toreign over it.
But, though she noticed it, she was herself in such high spirits at that moment, so far from sorrow, sadness, or self-reproach, that she purposely deceived herself as young people often do. Even his wit and knowledge of the world were spoiled, and his affected gaiety was touched with sadness, by the odour of falsehood which escaped through every pore of his body."
Anna Mikhaylovna regarded the refined sadness that united her son to the wealthy Julie with emotion, and resignation to the Divine will. 
He suddenly felt sorry for her and was vaguely conscious that he might be the cause of the sadness her face expressed.The sadness in her voice chased away his mirth.
I'm saddened I can't keep her with me very long.
His words saddened her.
This one left her saddened and frustrated.
The idea of something so horrible happening to him saddened her.
When we were in Texas, I got the feeling that Señor Medena loved Alex - that he was saddened by the way Alex rejected him.
Every dead soldier has a face, a story, and a bereaved family.
During this time Rome was horrorstruck by the mysterious murder of the young duke of Gandia, and the bereaved pope mourned his son with the wildest grief.
She is personified as a widowed princess, bereaved and desolate, sitting amid the ruins of her former joys, and brooding over her calamities.
His father, consul in 487, seems to have died soon after; for Boetius states that, when he was bereaved of his parent, men of the highest rank took him under their charge (De Con.
I don't know what to say, except, don't let it make you bitter about life.
Out of respect for Katie, he bit back the bitter words at the tip of his tongue.  He stalked past her, waiting for the moment he could release the pent up fury and magic.
Prevented him from carrying out his planned crusade against Bohemia, his successor was a scarcely less bitter enemy of the country.
The bitter invectives against Ammon, Moab, Edom, Philistia, Tyre, Sidon and Egypt, put into Yahweh's mouth, are based wholly on the fact that these peoples are regarded as hostile and hurtful to Israel; Babylonia, though nowise superior to Egypt morally, is favoured and applauded because it is believed to be the instrument for securing ultimately the prosperity of Yahweh's people.
His ecclesiastical legislation, too, met with bitter opposition from the Church.
The new premiers first act was one which cannot be sufficiently praised: he suppressed all subsidies to journalists, and although this resulted in bitter attacks against him in the columns of the reptile press it commanded the approval of all right-thinking men..
Xander sat, and Gerry poured them both coffee, aware of his addiction for the bitter human drink.
Despite the bitter words, there was regret on Wynn's face.
They had knocked heads and locked wills over the death of a Bird Song guest during the prior January's Ice Climbing Festival when bitter words were exchanged.
"Ah, how bitter it is to love someone near to you and to feel that..." she went on in a trembling voice, "that you can do nothing for him but grieve him, and to know that you cannot alter this.
"Gods, if I could send her home with that demon in your place, I -" "Gabriel!" she exclaimed, startled by his bitter emotion.
The colonies were, however, to have other and bitter experiences of strikes before Labour recognized that of all means for settling industrial Australians in South America.
"Didn't think this silly little girl that believed your lies for years had it in her?" she asked in a bitter tone.
"Even someone who reads minds?" he demanded with a bitter laugh.
She was going to say that the bitter note in her tone was for someone who had betrayed her, but the whole world didn't need to know about their shame.
The mountain tribes on the road (the Oxii, Pers, Huzha), accustomed to exact blackmail even from the king's train, learnt by a bitter lesson that a stronger hand had come to wield the empire.
Dubois's success strengthened him against the bitter opposition of a large section of the court.
Instead of the sweet taste she expected, it was bitter - like alum.
Bitter disappointment, however, soon overcame them, the Samaritans were strong enough to thwart and hinder their temple-building, and it seemed as though the divine favour was withdrawn.
Pastor Frecht of Nuremberg pursued him with bitter zeal. 
The well-meaning but weak king Zedekiah he denounces with bitter scorn as a perjured traitor (xvii).
A bitter principle to which the name of quercin has been applied by Gerber, its discoverer, has also been detected in the acorn of the common oak; the nutritive portion seems chiefly a form of starchHe urged on the bill by which Catholics were prohibited from sitting in either House of Parliament, and was bitter in his expressions of disappointment when the Commons passed a proviso excepting James, against whom the bill was especially aimed, from its operation.
The gall-bladder, appropriately designated as "the bitter," was regarded as a part of the liver, and the cystic duct (compared, apparently, to a "penis") to which it is joined, as well as the hepatic duct (pictured as an "outlet") and the ductus choleductus (described as a "yoke"), all had their special designations.
Count Casimir Batthyany attacked him in The Times, and Szemere, who had been prime minister under him, published a bitter criticism of his acts and character, accusing him of arrogance, cowardice and duplicity.
Being detected, he fled in order to escape punishment, but returned when Athenion (or Aristion), a bitter opponent of the Romans, had made himself tyrant of the city with the aid of Mithradates.
"I'm not going to eat you, so you can stop looking at me like that," he said with a bitter edge that was lost on her.
The first mouthful tasted like bitter honey and she drank the bottle down, sighing again.
In this, despite bitter opposition, he made many significant changes.
The comparatively rapid growth of the tree is its great recommendation to the planter; it is best raised from acorns sown on the spot, as they are very bitter and little liable to the attacks of vermin; the tree sends down a long tap-root, which should be curtailed by cutting or early transplanting, if the young trees are to be removed.
When, in course of time, the extended suffrage increased the Republican and Extreme Radical elements in the Chamber, and the Liberal Pentarchy (composed of Crispi, Cairoli, Nicotera, Zanardelli and Baccarini) assumed an attitude of bitter hostility to Depretis, the Right, obeying the impulse of Minghetti, rallied openly to Depretis, lending him aid without which his prolonged term of office would have been impossible.
The course taken by Cranmer in promoting the Reformation exposed him to the bitter hostility of the reactionary party or " men of the old learning," of whom Gardiner and Bonner were leaders, and on various occasions - notably in 1543 and 1 545 - conspiracies were formed in the council or elsewhere to effect his overthrow.
Legislation had to be entirely reformed, and the bill for abolIshing the special jurisdiction for the clergy (foro ecclesiastico) and other medieval privileges aroused the bitter opposition of the Vatican as well as of the Piedmontese clericals.
Will he not always have a bitter feeling toward me?
He was almost as bitter against Wyatt and Mason, whom he denounced as a "papist," and the violence of his conduct led Francis I.
Bitterness crept through her as she dwelled on his words.
Africanum, and like opaque bdellium lacks the white streaks which are characteristic of myrrh and bissa bol, both are acrid, but have scarcely any bitterness or aroma.
Suddenly, Deidre's vague story of lost love and Gabe's bitterness towards her clicked.
Some comments by Wesley upon Toplady's presentation of Calvinism led to a controversy which was carried on with much bitterness on both sides.
His was a bitter awakening, and the bitterness of it found expression in some remarkable words addressed to the volksraad: " I would rather," said Burgers in March 1877, " be a policeman under a strong government than the president of such a state.
The bitterness which this occurrence provoked was intensified by a political reaction which was initiated about the same time under Kenneritz.
The tone of the canvass was one of unusual bitterness, amounting sometimes to actual ferocity.
No child ever drank deeper of the cup of bitterness than I did.
She recalled with bitterness how he'd plied her with potion, falsely igniting her deep seeded passions until there was no turning back from his rampant lust.
The bitterness in his voice was not lost on Gabe.
But Nef'i could revile as well as praise, and such was the bitterness of some of his satires that certain influential personages who came under his lash induced Murad IV.
And then the bitterness was gone from his eyes, leaving only the sweetness... and a touch of something else.
A violent article, in which he demanded the annexation of Hanover and Saxony, and attacked with great bitterness the Saxon royal house, led to an estrangement from his father, who enjoyed the warm friendship of the king.
The Republican leaders straightway quarrelled among themselves, thus starting the long series of factional strifes which have characterized the party politics of New York state; the bitterness of the factions and the irresponsible council of appointment are also responsible for the firm establishment early in the Republican regime of the " spoils system."
"And you?" she asked, bitterness in her voice.
Always notably courteous in his treatment of opponents, he showed no bitterness either towards J.
µbppa; the Arabic murr, bitter, was applied to the substance from its bitterness), a gum-resin highly esteemed by the ancients as an unguent and perfume, used for incense in temples and also in embalming.
The strife was often conducted on both sides with a zeal and bitterness of language which were characteristic of the period.
Xander smiled at the bitterness in Ingrid's tone.
Dean could read the bitterness in his voice.
The bitterness in his voice bothered her.
The task of averting the racial bitterness so dominant in the United States of America is a most formidable one.
Considerable bitterness prevails between the rival confessions, each aiming at political ascendancy, but the government favours none.
He remained in opposition, distinguishing himself by the courtly bitterness of his attacks on George II., who learned to hate him violently.
His attitude is one not of bitterness but of calm hopelessness, with an occasional tinge of disgust or contempt.
Occasioned by this question had started from the very beginning of the Council, and were carried on with great bitterness on both sides.
Mill's friendship with Mrs Taylor and their marriage in 1851 involved a break with his family (apparently due to his resentment at a fancied slight, not to any bitterness on their part), and his practical disappearance from society.
After a peaceful period of a quarter of a century the Armenian subjects of Russia in Transcaucasia were filled with bitterness and discontent by the confiscation of the properties of their national (Gregorian) church by the Russian treasury.
The bitterness aroused by the ardent and to some extent unjust zeal of the reforming element can only be conjectured.
The ethical standard of the book is high except in the bitterness displayed towards the "wicked," that is, the enemies of the Jews.
Palaeologus, had been advised by his experienced father to avoid all serious negotiations, as they had invariably resulted in increased bitterness; but John, in view of the rapid dismemberment of his empire by the Turks, felt constrained to seek a union.
It was many years before the bitterness of feeling aroused by the repeal agitation entirely subsided in Nova Scotia.
He wrote a small book of memoirs of this campaign, Allemands et francais (1871), in which he spoke of the conquerors without bitterness; this attitude was all the more praiseworthy as his mother was an Alsatian, and he was unable to resign, himself to the loss of Alsace and Lorraine.
The bitterness is imparted by such substances as bitter orange rind, gentian, rhubarb, quassia, cascarilla, angostura, quinine and cinchona.
On the 3rd of August, shorn of much of its original bitterness, the so-called Confutatio pontificia was read; it well expresses the views approved in substance by the emperor and all the Catholic party.
The struggle, which still further aggravated the dependence of the pope on France, was waged on both sides with the utmost bitterness, and the end was not in sight when John XXII.
The bitterness and persistency of his attacks on his colleague Pierre Bayle led to the latter being deprived of his chair in 1693.
One of the most useful nutritious species is Cetraria islandica, " Iceland moss," which, after being deprived of its bitterness by boiling in water, is reduced to a powder and made into cakes, or is boiled and eaten with milk by the poor Icelander, whose sole food it often constitutes.
The stirring incidents in the political emancipation of Portugal inspired his muse, and he describes the bitterness of exile, the adventurous expedition to Terceira, the heroic defence of Oporto, and the final combats of liberty.
Fourthly, the enforcement of the fugitive slave law aroused a feeling of bitterness in the North which helped eventually to bring on the war, and helped to make it, when it came, quite as much an anti-slavery crusade as a struggle for the preservation of the Union.
Francois Sanchez (1562-1632), professor of medicine and philosophy in Toulouse, combated the Aristotelianism of the schools with much bitterness, and was the author of a book with the title Quod nihil scitur.
At the same time the bitterness of Hume's feelings and their effect are of importance in his life.
lengthy silence followed, and she bitterly considered how well he had betrayed her.
Thereupon Pretorius, with those most bitterly opposed to British rule, retreated across the Vaal.
Calhoun, bitterly hostile to the last, objected to the usual vote of thanks to the retiring vice-president, but withdrew his objection.
Thus, towards the end of his reign, Louis found himself cut off from the Greek emperor, his sole ally in the Balkans, by a chain of bitterly hostile Greek-Orthodox states, extending from the Black Sea to the Adriatic. The 1 Knatchbull-Hugessen, i.
Much was hoped from the duma, but this body has proved bitterly opposed to the Jewish claim for liberty.
Amari's La Guerra del Vespro Siciliano (8th ed., Florence, 1876) is a valuable history, but the author is too bitterly prejudiced against the French to be quite impartial; his work should be compared with L.
According to a later story, Achilles, after he had slain the Amazonian queen Penthesilea, bitterly lamented her death; for this he was reviled by Thersites, who even insulted the body of the dead queen.
He was bitterly denounced by slaveholders and also by such non-slaveholders as disapproved of all antislavery agitation, and in January 1827 he was assaulted and seriously injured by a slave-trader, Austin Woolfolk, whom he had severely criticized in his paper.
The loss of their independence was, however, felt bitterly by the broken out the Free State began to expel British subjects, and the very first act of war was committed by Free State Boers, who, on the 11th of October, seized a train upon the border belonging to Natal.
He had lost his hold upon Pennsylvania and his support in the house, while a cabal in the senate, bitterly and personally hostile to the treasury, crippled the administration and reduced every government measure to mere inanity.
Even after the Peace of Aix-la-Chapelle (1748) the Iroquois complained bitterly of the fraudulent land speculators, and in 1753 the chiefs of the Mohawks threatened to declare the covenant chain broken.
I-6, in which the public and private corruption of a hopeless age is bitterly bewailed, possibly belongs to the same continent.
He was bitterly opposed to the war of 1812, and openly advocated the formation of a northern confederacy to escape the rule of the "Virginia dynasty."
In Bosnia the weather resembles that of the south Austrian highlands, generally mild, though apt to be bitterly cold in winter.
1916, at the time of the first Military Service bill, from pledging themselves to support the Government in the prosecution of the war; but he declared at the same time, to the general surprise, that he and his friends were the most bitterly antiGerman section of the people.
In a pathetic speech to his children on his deathbed, he bitterly lamented his youthful offence in opposing the prophet, although Mahomet had forgiven him and had frequently affirmed that "there was no Mussulman more sincere and steadfast in the faith than `Amr."
From Strido he went to Aquileia, where he formed some friendships among the monks of the large monastery, notably with Rufinus, with whom he was destined to quarrel bitterly over the question of Origen's orthodoxy and worth as a commentator; for Jerome was a man who always sacrificed a friend to an opinion, and when he changed sides in a controversy expected his acquaintances to follow him.
The French ambassador, de la Haye, had delayed bringing him the customary gifts, with the idea that he would, like his predecessors, speedily give place to a new grand vizier; Kuprili was bitterly offended, and, on pretext of an abuse of the immunities of diplomatic correspondence, bastinadoed the ambassador's son and cast him and the ambassador himself into prison.
He had no sooner done so than he bitterly repented his weakness; and acting, as he himself says, on the principle that " to take an oath which never ought to have been taken is to estrange one's self from God, but to retract what one has wrongfully sworn to, is to return back to God," when he got safe again into France he attacked the transubstantiation theory more vehemently than ever.
He was for a few years a successful "coach" at Oxford, but in 1838 Was bitterly disappointed at not being elected to the professorship of Greek at Glasgow.
They felt they must resist him to the death, and with the troops scattered throughout Italy, and the newly enfranchised Italians, to whom it was understood that Sulla was bitterly hostile, they counted confidently on success.
The Jews, less bitterly opposed to Mahommedanism than the Christians were, caught fire more rapidly, and in some cases served as an intermediate link or channel of communication.
Although bitterly opposed by the partisans of scholastic routine, Genovesi found influential patrons, amongst them Bartolomeo Intieri, a Florentine, who in 1754 founded the first Italian or European chair of political economy (commerce and mechanics), on condition that Genovesi should be the first professor, and that it should never be held by an ecclesiastic. The fruit of Genovesi's professorial labours was the Lezioni di Commercio, the first complete and systematic work in Italian on economics.
He bitterly resented the concession of independence to Scotland by the treaty of Northampton of 1328, and the death of Robert Bruce in 1329 gave him a chance of retrieving his position.
A disciple of Neander and friend of Richard Rothe, Muller bitterly opposed the philosophy of Hegel and the criticism of F.
The imposition of these taxes was bitterly resented in the colonies, where it quickly crystallized public opinion round the principle of " No taxation without representation."
During the three or four years which followed the signing of the Augsburg Confession in 1530 and the formation of the Schmalkaldic League, England, while bitterly dep ouncing and burning Lutheran heretics in the name of the Holy Catholic Church, was herself engaged in severing the bonds which had for well-nigh a thousand of years bound her to the Apostolic See.
It is of interest to note that, although John Bunyan was bitterly opposed to Quakers, his friends, on hearing of the petition contemplated by them, requested them to insert his name on the list, and in this way he gained his freedom.
At Denver the South Platte is joined by Cherry Creek, and here in October 1858 were established on opposite sides of the creek two bitterly rival settlements, St Charles and Auraria; the former was renamed almost immediately Denver, after General J.
The losses in battle having been insignificant, there remain some 30,000 to account for - most of whom probably escaped individually by the help of the inhabitants, who were bitterly hostile to the French.
His perfect command of temper, his moderation of speech and action, in a bitterly personal age, never failed, and were his most effective weapons; but he made his power felt in other ways.
She handed him a light blue shirt.
A patch of blue cement suggested a swimming pool might also inhabit the estate.
She'd left town a year ago to get away from two heartbreaks: Papa's death and Aaron's unavailability, only for him to call out of the blue when she just so happened to be in town.
She appeared as he remembered her the day of her murder: a ten-year-old with long blonde hair, striking blue eyes, and golden skin.
I've got a black and blue mark on my ribs from his version of Saturday night fever.
Dulce appeared at Carmen's side, dressed in a dark blue gown with a high collar.
Alex wore a light blue sweater that accentuated his dark complexion and Jonathan was dressed likewise.
Then she looked at Zeb, whose face was blue and whose hair was pink, and gave a little laugh that sounded a bit nervous.
Both of them were surprised to see the blue truck parked in the yard when they returned.
On the other side of the rocks, water sprang from the ground and spilled off a ledge into a large blue pool.
Their eyes met for a moment... piercing blue eyes meeting startled green eyes in a battle of nerve.
Thick dark lashes and a deep tan intensified the blue of his eyes, and his freshly shaven face had attractive angles.
His eyes were dancing with amusement as he used one hand to jerk the towel free and expose cut-off blue jeans.
Something blue in the shadow of the trees caught her attention.
His face was sober, the blue eyes probing her mind again.
Eyes of blue ice turned on Allen and Giddon's voice was almost a growl.
There was no mistaking the devotion in the beautiful blue eyes.
Tammy shrugged her tiny shoulders, the large blue eyes imploring her not to pry.
Her mischievous blue eyes sought her father first and then her grandmother.
"Here's what we have; a dark blue or black van without side or back windows, with out of state license plates," Detective Dick said.
A curly blond head peeked around the corner and large blue eyes studied the stranger cautiously.
He raised the dark brow further, blue eyes twinkling with humor.
He grinned, the expression creating little lines around his sparkling blue eyes.
It was Yancey, clad in boots, Jeans and a light blue polo shirt.
A touch of humor flashed in those blue pools, and then it was gone.
"It's blue," the woman whom I learned was called Nancy answered.
Grasso bought a dark blue van on the Internet and the guy delivered it here.
The neighbor we woke up says he's been around and he drives a dark blue van.
A blue haired old lady with a walker and her mate hauling an oxygen tank looked at me as If I was the Boston strangler.
She walked stiffly to the closet, deciding quickly on a pair of blue jeans and a light shirt with a collar that would hide most of her neck.
I immediately knew where I was; on the carousel because I was spinning slowly around while blue and red lights revolved around the room.
Two valets rapidly dressed His Majesty, and wearing the blue uniform of the Guards he went with firm quick steps to the reception room. 
Here and there over the whole of that blue expanse, to right and left of the forest and the road, smoking campfires could be seen and indefinite masses of troops--ours and the enemy's.
"And who is that?" he asked, indicating a short old man in a clean blue peasant overcoat, with a big snow-white beard and eyebrows and a ruddy face.
One, a tall, fair- haired lad in a clean blue coat, was standing over the others.
A vein in the young man's long thin neck swelled like a cord and went blue behind the ear, and suddenly his face flushed.
One of these, a nimble little man, was wearing a blue coat tied round the waist with a rope.
The little barefooted Frenchman in the blue coat went up to the Armenians and, saying something, immediately seized the old man by his legs and the old man at once began pulling off his boots.
The flogging was only just over, and the executioner was releasing from the flogging bench a stout man with red whiskers, in blue stockings and a green jacket, who was moaning piteously.
He wore a woman's loose gown of frieze, blue trousers, and large torn Hessian boots.
The Emperor began to breathe heavily and rapidly, his lower lip trembled, and tears instantly appeared in his fine blue eyes.
All the evening Nicholas paid attention to a blue-eyed, plump and pleasing little blonde, the wife of one of the provincial officials.
Until that point, eminent success lay just around the corner; now, absent any leads, a wave of despair descended over me like a blanket of morning fog.
One man says, in his despair or indifference to life, take up a handful of the earth at your feet, and paint your house that color.
Now, when I look around and listen to humanity-driven news, I despair, I really do.
Well, don't despair, help is at hand and we're not talking about microwave meals.
As much despair as she felt for each of the forty-three deaths, there would be nothing but doom, disease, and death for her people if she did not stay alive.
In her half-asleep despair, she was convinced no one but the Deans would even believe her.
A stereotyped but unconscious despair is concealed even under what are called the games and amusements of mankind.
Can he look up at its colossal evil without once feeling despair?
The black memories that made him wake up screaming at night, the fear he could still taste in moments of despair, were softened by the sense of stillness that settled into him.
No Roman slave, he says, "needed to despair of becoming both a freeman and a citizen."
Better die a thousand times than risk receiving an unkind look or bad opinion from him, Rostov decided; and sorrowfully and with a heart full despair he rode away, continually looking back at the Tsar, who still remained in the same attitude of indecision.
In despair she had dropped the subject for the time, only to renew it at the first opportunity.
It was a despair he'd felt in the catacombs, when he'd seen nothing but death as his fate.
She would refuse to gift him the demon; however, she could not help but despair at the idea that she was not yet ready to die herself.
To this course Napoleon consented, to the despair of King Victor Emmanuel and Cavour, who saw in this a proof that he wished to back out of his engagement and make war impossible.
Princess Mary wrote that she was in despair at the misunderstanding that had occurred between them.
But no: I find that the respectable man, so called, has immediately drifted from his position, and despairs of his country, when his country has more reason to despair of him.
We should impart our courage, and not our despair, our health and ease, and not our disease, and take care that this does not spread by contagion.
Flourishing his arms in despair the count left the room without replying.
Don't despair, Your Choice Media has a solution to your needs.
This has obscured the fact that the inner history of antiquity, ending as it did in despair of this world, must in any event have seen a recurrence of barbarism.
I sometimes despair of getting anything quite simple and honest done in this world by the help of men.
It is a ray of light in the darkness, a shade between sadness and despair, showing the possibility of consolation.
Something within Katie snapped at the despair in Deidre's voice.
The growing despair meant many looked to the Nazi National Front for salvation.
Every year since her marriage Anne had given birth to a child, and Henry had no reason to despair of more; while, if Henry's state of health was such as was reported, the desire for children, which Anne shared with him, may be urged as an argument for her guilt.
Samaritans believe that offering people the opportunity to be listened to in confidence and accepted without prejudice, can alleviate despair and suicidal feelings.
Her gaze went to the safe again, the despair within her swirling.
She barely recognized the feral look on his face, and despair slid through her.
He did not know that Natasha's soul was overflowing with despair, shame, and humiliation, and that it was not her fault that her face happened to assume an expression of calm dignity and severity.
In her despair she turned for comfort and counsel to Sainte-Beuve, now constituted her regular father confessor.
Until that point, eminent success lay just around the corner; now, absent any leads, a wave of despair descended over me like a blanket of morning fog.
One man says, in his despair or indifference to life, take up a handful of the earth at your feet, and paint your house that color.
Now, when I look around and listen to humanity-driven news, I despair, I really do.
Well, don't despair, help is at hand and we're not talking about microwave meals.
As much despair as she felt for each of the forty-three deaths, there would be nothing but doom, disease, and death for her people if she did not stay alive.
In her half-asleep despair, she was convinced no one but the Deans would even believe her.
A stereotyped but unconscious despair is concealed even under what are called the games and amusements of mankind.
Can he look up at its colossal evil without once feeling despair?
The black memories that made him wake up screaming at night, the fear he could still taste in moments of despair, were softened by the sense of stillness that settled into him.
No Roman slave, he says, "needed to despair of becoming both a freeman and a citizen."
Better die a thousand times than risk receiving an unkind look or bad opinion from him, Rostov decided; and sorrowfully and with a heart full despair he rode away, continually looking back at the Tsar, who still remained in the same attitude of indecision.
In despair she had dropped the subject for the time, only to renew it at the first opportunity.
It was a despair he'd felt in the catacombs, when he'd seen nothing but death as his fate.
She would refuse to gift him the demon; however, she could not help but despair at the idea that she was not yet ready to die herself.
To this course Napoleon consented, to the despair of King Victor Emmanuel and Cavour, who saw in this a proof that he wished to back out of his engagement and make war impossible.
Princess Mary wrote that she was in despair at the misunderstanding that had occurred between them.
But no: I find that the respectable man, so called, has immediately drifted from his position, and despairs of his country, when his country has more reason to despair of him.
We should impart our courage, and not our despair, our health and ease, and not our disease, and take care that this does not spread by contagion.
Flourishing his arms in despair the count left the room without replying.
Don't despair, Your Choice Media has a solution to your needs.
This has obscured the fact that the inner history of antiquity, ending as it did in despair of this world, must in any event have seen a recurrence of barbarism.
I sometimes despair of getting anything quite simple and honest done in this world by the help of men.
It is a ray of light in the darkness, a shade between sadness and despair, showing the possibility of consolation.
Something within Katie snapped at the despair in Deidre's voice.
The growing despair meant many looked to the Nazi National Front for salvation.
Every year since her marriage Anne had given birth to a child, and Henry had no reason to despair of more; while, if Henry's state of health was such as was reported, the desire for children, which Anne shared with him, may be urged as an argument for her guilt.
Samaritans believe that offering people the opportunity to be listened to in confidence and accepted without prejudice, can alleviate despair and suicidal feelings.
Her gaze went to the safe again, the despair within her swirling.
She barely recognized the feral look on his face, and despair slid through her.
He did not know that Natasha's soul was overflowing with despair, shame, and humiliation, and that it was not her fault that her face happened to assume an expression of calm dignity and severity.
In her despair she turned for comfort and counsel to Sainte-Beuve, now constituted her regular father confessor.
I have been despairing at the thought of this.
After the despairing cry I looked quickly into the night sky.
My despairing thought is, "Who will want me now?"
It was a despairing dive into depression.
Was written by a Jew in exile, who, despairing of a national restoration, looked only for a spiritual recompense in heaven.
He found Sarah in the drawing room, again, right where he had left her, despondence across her face
Marilyn was despondent after her husband of fifty years died.
How can I help but be despondent after losing my job?
My son was quite despondent when his girlfriend dumped him.
As John held a gun to his head, everyone realized how despondent he was.
Because I just won a huge lottery, I am no longer despondent about my financial concerns.
The man on the talk show was despondent about his son’s death.
The little girl was so disconsolate after her puppy ran away that her parents put up posters all over the neighborhood.
Anticipating that the prisoner would be disconsolate at receiving a life sentence, the judge decided to hand down the punishment in closed court.
Nicole was disconsolate after the breakup and refused to allow her friends to comfort her.
Although he was disappointed at not winning a medal, he was not disconsolate because the experience had been so amazing.
I could tell by Andrew’s disconsolate posture that his team had lost the game.
A disconsolate ghost wanders the halls of the old mansion, calling for her lost love.
The clouds made the morning appear quite dismal.
Because the critics called the play a dismal failure, few people purchased tickets for the stage production.
The team ended the school year with a dismal record of one win and eleven losses.
Since the unemployment rate is at its highest level in a decade, the economy is in a dismal state.
When I saw the doctor’s dismal face, I knew the news was not going to be good.
Amy didn’t study so it’s not surprising she dismally failed the test.
While Ted swore he wouldn’t return to his small town, he dismally retreated to his birthplace after he failed to become a big star.
Numerous fights dismally highlight the couple’s failed marriage.
With this latest tax hike, the government continues to dismally fail the public.
When the police arrived on the scene, the blind date dismally ended.
The anxiety attack left me in a bit of distress.
When the boat caught on fire, the captain issued a distress call.
Janice cannot stop crying because she is experiencing emotional distress.
Because the dog is in distress, it needs to be cared for by a veterinarian.
Geri’s mental distress was so intense it gave her a migraine headache.
My mother’s eyes were doleful after my father moved out of the house.
Because Jane has not received any news of her missing son, she has been doleful to the point of not being able to eat or sleep.
The doleful music made everyone cry.
After I read about the tragedy, I felt doleful for several hours.
The child had a doleful look on his face when he learned Santa Claus was not real.
As soon as I saw the doctor’s doleful expression, I knew my father’s condition was not good.
The forlorn man was so sad he thought about killing himself.
When we visit the nursing home, we try to spend extra time with all of the forlorn senior citizens.
The forlorn widow was so unhappy she stopped eating.
Since Jake works so much, he does not realize his wife is forlorn because she rarely gets to spend time with him.
The forlorn dog has been inconsolable since his master died.
At the school dance, the shy girl stood in the corner and looked forlorn.
Because the sky looked gloomy, I took an umbrella to work.
My retirement funds have decreased because of the gloomy economy.
During the funeral, the widow had a gloomy expression on her face.
The marathon is being cancelled because of the gloomy weather.
Looking at the gloomy painting makes me very sad.
Ancient writers spoke of all these Gauls as Cimbri, and identified them with the Cimmerians of earlier date, who in Homeric times dwelt on the ocean next to the Laestrygones, in a region of wintry gloom, but where the sun set not in summer.
It prefers by day the gloom of caves and ruins, or of the burrows which it occasionally forms, and issues forth at sunset, when it commences its unearthly howling.
Was marked by much trouble in domestic politics, and by some great national calamities and foreign complications, while the declining health of the monarch himself cast a gloom over the court and governing classes.
He was the last and the most wilful but perhaps the best of her favourites, and his tragic fate deepened the gloom of her closing years.
But Petya did not let go of him and Dolokhov saw through the gloom that Petya was bending toward him and wanted to kiss him.
" and begirt my head " (Septuagint) " with gloom " (ri Is.
As Johnson thought it unsafe to pursue the routed army his victory had no other effect than the erection here of the useless defences of Fort William Henry, but as it was the only success in a year of gloom parliament rewarded him with a grant of X 5000 and the title of a baronet.
But the gloom of Juvenal's pessimism is unlighted by hope.
Boris sketched two trees in the album and wrote: "Rustic trees, your dark branches shed gloom and melancholy upon me."
A gloom was cast over the first parliament of the Dominion by the assassination in 1868 of one of the most brilliant figures in the politics of the time, D'Arcy McGee (q.v.).
The death of the young prince threw a gloom over the country, and caused the royal family to spend the year in such retirement as was possible.
The rays had to struggle through a disturbing medium; they reached him refracted, dulled and discoloured by the thick gloom which had settled on his soul, and, though they might be sufficiently clear to guide him, were too dim to cheer him.
The gloom and harshness of these Spanish mystics are absent from the tender, contemplative spirit of Francois de Sales (1567-1622); and in the quietism Fof Mme Guyon (1648-1717) and Miguel de Molinos (1627-1696) there is again a sufficient implication of mystical doctrine to rouse the suspicion of the ecclesiastical authorities.
The uniform gloom of this, the most dirge-like of all the pieces, is unrelieved by a single ray of hope, even the hope of vengeance; cf.
The refusal of the council to accept the recommendation of the senate, that they should appoint an eminent Unitarian minister to the professorship of logic and mental philosophy, revived all De Morgan's sensitiveness on the subject of sectarian freedom; and, though his feelings were doubtless excessive, there is no doubt that gloom was thrown over his life, intensified in 1867 by the loss of his son George Campbell De Morgan, a young man of the highest scientific promise, whose name, as De Morgan expressly wished, will long be connected with the London Mathematical Society, of which he was one of the founders.
Eighteen months later the coronation took place at Moscow with great pomp, but a gloom was thrown over the festivities by the unfortunate incident of the Khodinskoe Polye, a great open space near the city, where a popular fete had been prepared and where, from defective police arrangements, a large number of men, women and children, roughly estimated at 2000, were crushed and trampled to death.
At the same time the feeling he had noticed between his protegee Natasha and Prince Andrew accentuated his gloom by the contrast between his own position and his friend's.
Throughout all periods of Babylonian-Assyrian history, the conception prevailed of a large dark cavern below the earth, not far from the Apsu - the ocean encircling and flowing underneath the earth - in which al] the dead were gathered and where they led a miserable existence of inactivity amid gloom and dust.
Only occasionally is light let in to mitigate the horror of the gloom, and then not so much through a window as through a hole.
The effect of the light falling upon them is to produce along the midrib of each a number of short white streaks of light, which contrast most strongly with the shadows cast by the leaves themselves, and with the general twilight gloom of the forest.
Its general connexion with death is due no doubt to the greyish colour of its leaves and its yellowish flowers, which suggest the gloom of the underworld and the pallor of death.
It must have been composed in a time of natural gloom and depression, after Yahweh's anger had been provoked by "a very froward generation," certainly not before the Assyrian Empire had loomed up against the political horizon, aggressive and menacing.
But Berezowski's pistol shot, which accentuated the estrangement from the tsar, and the news of the death of Maximilian at Queretaro, cast a gloom over the later fetes.
It is not proposed to deal here with incidents appertaining to the "ante-natal gloom," and we are concerned only with human beings when once they have been born.
Dean dusted off a Christmas present bottle of VO with thoughts of re-igniting the glow from Ethel's gin and chasing away the gloom of the empty house but one sip and he re-capped the jug, deciding it wasn't a good idea.
Two events now occurred which served to cast a gloom over the poet's life and to interrupt his activity, - the outbreak of the Civil War, and the tragic fate of his wife, who, having accidentally allowed her dress to catch fire, was burnt to death in her own house in 1861.
On the other hand, it is entirely intelligible that a prophecy relating to Scythians should have been re-shaped to apply to later conditions, and on this view it is explicable why the indefinite political convulsions should be adjusted to the exile and why the gloom should be relieved by the promise of a territory extending from the Mediterranean to the Syrian desert (ii.
The early death of his parents, which illustrated to him in the most forcible manner the unstableness of all human existence, threw a gloom over his whole life, and fostered in him that earnest piety and fervent love for solitude and meditation which have left numerous traces in his poetical writings, and served him throughout his literary career as a powerful antidote against the enticing favours of princely courts, for which he, unlike most of his contemporaries, never sacrificed a tittle of his self-esteem.
The news of this crushing blow cast a gloom over Germany, which was again suffering from the attacks of her unruly neighbors
The seers of Israel were content to dismiss their dead to a land of silence and darkness, the vast hollow gloom of the subterranean Sheol.'
On an isolated hill above the junction of the parent streams, named Sorrow and Care, stands the ruin of Castle Campbell, known also as Gloom Castle, an old stronghold of the Argyll family.
Mar's highlanders began to desert; his council was a confusion of opinions and discontents, and when, after many dangers and in the worst of health, James joined the Jacobites at Perth, it was only to discourage his friends by his gloom, and to share their wintry flight before Argyll to Montrose.
This may be so; but it would be strange if a writer who could say," in much wisdom is much grief,"should deliberately laud wisdom.
The tales and descriptions of that time without exception speak only of the self-sacrifice, patriotic devotion, despair, grief, and the heroism of the Russians.
It was followed by others, painted on the same principles, but with greater perfection of art: "The Grief of Andromache" (1783), "The Oath of the Horatii" (Salon, 1785), "The Death of Socrates," "Love of Paris and Helen" (1788), "Brutus" (1789).
The blow was a fatal one to the aged and war-worn Campeador, who died of anger and grief in July 1099.
"My darling Mummy!" she repeated, straining all the power of her love to find some way of taking on herself the excess of grief that crushed her mother.
He showed his sturdy character by urging the king after the death of Absalom to place his duty to his people before his grief for the loss of his favourite son (2 Sam.
In March his illness was evidently gaining on him, to his great grief, because he knew that he alone could yet save France from the distrust of her monarch and the present reforms, and from the foreign interference, which would assuredly bring about catastrophes unparalleled in the history of the world.
The events of the previous year: the burning of Moscow and the flight from it, the death of Prince Andrew, Natasha's despair, Petya's death, and the old countess' grief fell blow after blow on the old count's head.
The disaster which aroused Nehemiah's grief was scarcely the fall of Jerusalem in 586 B.C., but a more recent one, and it has been conjectured that it followed the work of Ezra (in b above).
"You'll never get well like that," she would say, forgetting her grief in her vexation, "if you won't obey the doctor and take your medicine at the right time!
According to one account he was lost at sea, according to another he died at Stymphalus in Arcadia, and according to a third at Leucas, from grief at the loss by shipwreck of his baggage, containing a number of new plays which he had translated from Menander.
She said her only consolation was the fact that the princess allowed her to share her sorrow, that all the old misunderstandings should sink into nothing but this great grief; that she felt herself blameless in regard to everyone, and that he, from above, saw her affection and gratitude.
He died in the summer of 1904, amid the consternation of supporters and the deep grief of opponents of his Zionistic aims.
Achilles is a typical Greek hero; handsome, brave, celebrated for his fleetness of foot, prone to excess of wrath and grief, at the same time he is compassionate, hospitable, full of affection for his mother and respect for the gods.
The principal streets of the city meet in the place du Gouvernement: the rue Bab Azoun (Gate of Grief) which runs parallel to the boulevard de la Republique; the rue Bab-el-Oued (River Gate) which goes north to the site of the old arsenal demolished in 'goo; the rue de la Marine which leads to the ancient harbour, and in which are the two principal mosques.
As she had said, Destiny would have the love she deserved, and Lori would have the time to recover from grief before her decision became irreversible.
Other accounts of his death are: that he killed himself from grief at the failure of his journey to Hades; that he was struck with lightning by Zeus for having revealed the mysteries of the gods to men; or he was torn to pieces by the Maenads for having abandoned the cult of Dionysus for that of Apollo.
Out of pity for her grief, the gods changed Niobe herself into a rock on Mount Sipylus in Phrygia, in which form she continued to weep (Homer, Iliad, xxiv.
Nehemiah, the cup-bearer of Artaxerxes at Susa, plunged in grief at the news of the desolation of Jerusalem, obtained permission from the king to rebuild the ruinIn Turkish cemeteries the cypress "Dark tree, still sad when others' grief is fled, The only constant mourner o'er the dead" is the most striking feature, the rule being to plant one for each interment.
His death was an overwhelming grief to Chesterfield, and the discovery that he had long been married to a lady of humble origin must have been galling in the extreme to his father after his careful instruction in worldly wisdom.
That his temperament at the same time was frigid and comparatively passionless cannot be denied; but neither ought this to be imputed to him as a fault; hostile criticisms upon the grief for a father's death, that " was soothed by the conscious satisfaction that I had discharged all the duties of filial piety," seem somewhat out of place.
St.) is directed downwards and tapers out into a thin, partly cartilaginous, strand, which originally extended to the inner corner of the articular portion of the mandible, but on its long way comes to grief, being squeezed in between the pterygoid and quadrate.
When Roland heard of his wife's condemnation, he wandered some miles from his refuge in Rouen; maddened by despair and grief, he wrote a few words expressive of his horror at those massacres which could only be inspired by the enemies of France, protesting that "from the moment when I learned that they had murdered my wife I would no longer remain in a world stained with enemies."
She, resolving to apply the remedy for his grief, questions him for that purpose.
Muddles, grief for Mamma... business difficulties... muddles, terrible muddles!
Sonya was not less agitated than her friend by the latter's fear and grief and by her own personal feelings which she shared with no one.
The old valet Tikhon, with sunken, emaciated face that bore the stamp of inconsolable grief, replied: "Yes, Princess" to all Princess Mary's questions and hardly refrained from sobbing as he looked at her.
His only son died, to Cobden's inexpressible grief, at the age of fifteen, in 1856.
Alexander, overwhelmed with grief, shut himself up in Castle St Angelo, and then declared that the reform of the church would be the sole object of his life henceforth - a resolution which he did not keep. Every effort was made to discover the assassin, and suspicion fell on various highly placed personages.
The Mahommedans promptly responded to the challenge, for the danger was too serious to be neglected; the Sikh army was dispersed and two of Guru Govind Singh's sons were murdered at Sirhind by the governor of that fortress, and his mother died of grief at the cruel death of her grandchildren.
Amelia was grief-stricken as were all the Colletts.
Facing Amori with his grief-stricken face, he said.
Where Gwenda looked angry, Wulfric was grief-stricken.
She's too grief-stricken to see the truth, but I saw it right off.
The church had been packed with Perry’s grief-stricken family.
The goddess looked up, her face almost as grief-stricken as Thalia's.
They wouldn’t be grief-stricken if Tragus had died a natural death.
I saw it with my own eyes, Carney replied in a grief-stricken voice.
The thought of two days of grief-stricken silence with Dalynara was depressing.
Her defiance then gave way and she burst into tears, solid grief-stricken tears.
She was afraid that the vision was an omen of death, and she was grief-stricken.
Despite the drugs, he quickly went from disoriented to grief-stricken to violent.
One only asks why there is such a war which renders millions of people grief-stricken.
Oh, Cheryl, she said, exhausted by me, our eyes meeting in a grief-stricken détente.
Paul had moved into her shell, the one that had been abandoned by her grief-stricken family.
Was this the reaction of a grief-stricken husband or the award-winning act of a cold-blooded murderer?.
Dominique knew that she had been grief-stricken and hard to reach, so she understood why Nicole gave her a wide berth.
The doctor came every day, felt her pulse, looked at her tongue, and regardless of her grief-stricken face joked with her.
She saw grief-stricken children in desperate need, and every instinct within her impelled her to sweep them into her arms and nurture them.
Father’s grief-stricken, dark gaze, the sound of Ebira’s screams and weeping, Fyaile’s loving embrace and the two who carried Elior’s body away.
’ His tongue was split so that he could go to school where he learned to say Nevermore and other choice words with which he could torment grief-stricken poets.
" But Jesus seemed not to heed the servant's words, for, taking with him Peter, James, and John, he turned and said to the grief-stricken father: "Fear not; only believe.
I asked Reverend McKenzie if it was possible to prevent the Lawless One from achieving his goal and a look of concerned appeared on his grief-stricken face and he replied.
Barabbas's men had to overpower him, explaining to the curious crowd that the man was so grief-stricken he wanted to take Christ's place on the cross, as they wrestled the real Christ away.
Whereas he had then been quiet but with a strange look of sovereignty in his cold eyes that stared straight ahead as if in a daze and reluctant to make contact with the others, especially Feltus, Terence now undertook the appearance of a grief-stricken husband with his emotions evident only by his furrowed brow and white knuckles, though his straight shoulders and pushed-forward chest attempted to give the illusion of strength and determination.
If death is a gateway to Heaven, then when God had "mercy on him," was God not being cruel by keeping him out of Heaven? Why do most do all they can to live a little longer even if it is in pain? If death is a friend, why is this friend not a welcome visitor? Why are we grief-stricken and not rejoicing when someone we love is taken by his "friend" to be with Christ and God in Heaven? How could going from this life [from pain and troubles for many] to paradise be an enemy? If death is a doorway by which we go to Heaven at the moment of death, why would a person who had lived in pain for years, do everything possible to live a little longer? Why do we mourn and not rejoice if a love one who lives in pain would go to their everlasting residence in Heaven at death where there is no pain? Is it not because we know death is an enemy, not a friend [1 Corinthians 15:26], and they are under the power of death, not in Heaven? We will not have the victory over death unto the resurrection? But, many say going to Heaven is just what happens at death, even for the Old Testament saints who died before the death of Christ, therefore before their sins were paid for by His death.
If death is a gateway to Heaven, then when God had mercy on him, was God not being cruel by keeping him out of Heaven? Why do most do all they can to live a little longer, even if it is in pain? If death is a friend, why is this friend not a welcome visitor? Why are we grief-stricken and not rejoicing when our friend takes someone we love to be with Christ and God in Heaven? How could going from this life (from pain and troubles for many) to paradise be an enemy? If death is a doorway by which we go to Heaven at the moment of death, why would a person who had lived in pain for years do everything possible to stay out of Heaven and live a little longer, even if it were in pain? Why do we mourn and not rejoice if a love one who lives in pain would go to their everlasting residence in Heaven immediately after death where there is no pain? Is it not because we know death is an enemy, not a friend (1 Corinthians 15:26), and they are under the power of death, not in Heaven; do they not by their actions demonstrate beyond any doubt that they do not believe what they profess, that death is a friend that takes there loved one to be with Christ? We will not have the victory over death unto the resurrection? But, many say going to Heaven is just what happens at death, even for the Old Testament saints who died before the death of Christ: therefore, before their sins were paid for by His death.
He was grieved.
He has been grieved.
Blondeau was grieved.
Nangong Ping was grieved.
When mother died, I grieved.
God was very grieved and sad.
Her heart was really grieved.
I was so grieved at that time.
I figured I’d grieved enough.
We shall miss—We are grieved.
This news grieved him and yet he.
Something had made Him so grieved.
She'd be sadly grieved to hear you.
Even though I was not grieved about.
Ashamed and grieved of his trespasses.
The men were grieved, and they were.
As I grew I remembered how she grieved.
You will be grieved to hear that Mrs.earth, and it grieved him in his heart.
I have rejoiced and sometimes grieved,.
Trinity; and we have grieved Him by the.,alternately raged and grieved.
grieve and so on.
or grieve the Lord.
Grieve the loss,.
I grieve the lack.
Don’t you grieve.
So why grieve use-.
So why grieve for the.
She had begun to grieve.
I need no longer grieve.
Leave a widow to grieve,.
not grieve for the things.
You grieve the Holy Spirit.
But grieve, though, Enilia.
She had little time to grieve.
Don't grieve the spirit of God.
grieve for them as for the dead.
There will be a time to grieve.
If your hurts grieve you still.
Do not grieve too long for them.
[174] afligirse con, to grieve over.
'I would grieve indeed,' said Frodo.
No, no! It would grieve me too much.
They said, Do not fear, nor grieve.
Later they would have time to grieve.
grieve the mother I wished she'd been.
He couldn’t do anything but grieve.
‘I was grieving.
What a deep grieving.
haven for his grieving.
and his grieving family.
Hear the grieving mothers.
He was grieving for Rowan.
this grieving thing worked.
Easing this grieving heart.
but shots of a grieving Mrs.
And she is grieving over it.
her with the grieving process.
leaving the old love grieving.
grieving process for two years.
or their grieving loved ones!.
She’s grieving for my Dad.
She will be mourning and grieving.
Grieving should be done in private.
She certainly seemed to be grieving.
It also really helps in the grieving.
She was grieving and in tremendous pain.
They were grieving, as someone had died.
He was urged to join others in grieving.
I have been busy grieving the family I.
Many grieving families still shed tears.
'Margaret thou art grieving over there.
Hearing the heartbreak in her voice, Jule found his resolve to keep his distance melt.
Her heartbreak was in her voice, and he squeezed her closer to him.
He was heartbroken.
Tom is heartbroken. 
Tom was heartbroken. 
I know what it's like to be heartbroken
I knew Tom would be heartbroken.
He was heartbroken and hanged himself.
It's heartbreaking.
It was a heartbreaking story.
You have a heartbreaking task because.
It was a heartbreaking sight to witness.
He left behind a heartbreaking testament.
A Heartbreaking Work of Staggering Genius.
This was a heartbreaking experience for me.
It was heartbreaking for them and all the family.
The smell of the chicken stew was heartbreaking.
Because it was going to be a heartbreaking affair.
It was the most heartbreaking cry I’ve ever heard.
He didn’t want to relive the heartbreaking experience.
But seeing them so subdued and brow beaten was heartbreaking.
"Quinn, you didn't kill her, did you?" It was heartbreaking.
What is happening to them, my Lord? This is so heartbreaking.
I found it heartbreaking that I couldn’t live up to that hope.
Sick to her stomach and, worse, heartsick beyond any feeling of loss she had ever felt.
I wasn't physically ill, but heartsick at having Papa arrange a marriage to you when I was in love with Phillipe.
Although she laughed it off, called it losing a hundred and seventy-five pounds, Martina was obviously heartsick.
Feeling heartsick and angry, I rejoined the canvass, and between the eight of us, we came up with exactly no idea who had robbed the market and shot Maya Perez to death.
Ugh! Where the hell have you been the last few days? He was heartsick when he couldn’t find her, and could only conclude that she went out just before their escape from the planet.
While the boys were cleaning, hanging the spotlessly clean mattresses up to air, and unwillingly putting on clothes and packing bags, Jarek took Zeno into their room, heartsick that the boys were going; relieved it was over.
Was still too heartsick to sing the standard hymns (was basically on strike), completely missed out in the descant I was supposed to lead (couldn’t concentrate) but the congregation didn’t realise this.
From wrath the father had changed to heartsickness.
The Don Jail was not the place for heavy-hearted meditation.
I entered the yard heavy-hearted, not knowing what might have happened to them.
With a heavy heart, I proceed as though I hadn't received her message.
But we have a heavy heart and do not feel like rejoicing.
Lifter retains heavy heart despite winning efforts.
It is with a heavy, heavy heart that I bring you terrible news from Dodger Stadium.
Breaking up with an ex husband is a hurting and very.
Knowing how to resolve differences respectfully, without hurting your partner's feelings, is a critical skill for a satisfying long lasting relationship.
Because banks are hurting with the rising number of foreclosures.
To cope with such serious incidents and cases there are some points below that prevent you from hurting yourself which lead to loss of health or even life.
Doug and Joan Connick say big companies are hurting small farmers such as themselves by flooding the market with produce and buying water.
Find out four reasons why fitness clubs and commercial gyms may be hurting your fitness progress.
Eric Johnston The storm that pounded Melbourne last weekend is also hurting insurers.
The only way out of the relentless pendulum of pain that keeps loved ones hurting each other, over and over.
She was badly hurt in a car accident.
When I woke up this morning I hurt all over.
Their lack of interest in her work hurt her deeply.
The lack of rain has hurt the corn crop.
You're only hurting yourself by holding a grudge against them.
Be careful with that knife or you could hurt yourself.
Teens hurt in accommodation centre brawl.
Chronically hurtful people are those among us who are uninterested in the negative consequences their behavior has for others.
One day in the middle of a conversation between family members, friends, or complete strangers some hurtful words were said.
It is always hurtful to discover that your spouse is having an affair.
She can't forgive him for the hurtful things he said.
Crying is a response to a natural feeling of unhappiness, sadness, hurtfulness or other feeling of discomfort.
She went with hurtfulness in her heart.
A broken relationship gives a major hurtfulness inside the heart.
The native industries are inconsiderable, and many of them are in a languishing condition.
Had prosecuted with all his energies; which alone could revive the languishing reputation of the papacy, exercised on him by the French king Philip the Fair.
Finally, all idea of the divine vanished, and the artists merely presented her as the type of a beautiful woman, with oval face, full of grace and charm, languishing eyes, and laughing mouth, which replaced the dignified severity and repose of the older forms. The most famous of her statues in ancient times was that at Cnidus, the work of Praxiteles, which was imitated on the coins of that town, and subsequently reproduced in various copies, such as the Vatican and Munich.
A similar piece of cruelty was the execution, some time later, of the earl of Suffolk, who had been languishing long years in the Tower; he was destroyed not for any new plots, but simply for his Yorkist descent.
Raynald of Chatillon, the second husband of Constance of Antioch, after languishing in captivity from 1159 to 1176, had been granted the seignory of Krak, to the east and south of the Dead Sea.
A great wave of secularity rolled over the Church, engulfing the religious orders with the rest; love waxed cold, fervour languished; learning declined, discipline was relaxed, bitter rivalries broke out, especially between Franciscans and Dominicans.
The brotherhood appears to have languished in obscurity during the republic, and to have been revived by Augustus.
Agriculture languished, hampered, as in France before the Revolution, by the feudal privileges of a noble caste which no longer gave any equivalent service to the state; trade was strangled by the system of high tariffs at the frontier and internal octrois; and finally public credit was shaken to its foundations by lavish issues of paper money and the neglect to publish the budget.
In 1100 he was captured by Danishmend of Sivas, and he languished in prison till 1103.
In which had probably languished since the wreck of Jehoshaphat's ships (1 Kings xxii, 48); but the ancient kingdom had been re-established by the time of Ahaz,.
Many distinguished compositions appeared in its pages, but it gradually languished, and was given up after a year's experiment.
For the next six years the war languished owing to the timidity of the emperor, the incompetence of his generals and the exhaustion of the Porte; but on the 11th of September 1697 Prince Eugene of Savoy routed the Turks at Zenta and on the 13th of November 1698 a peace-congress was opened at Karlowitz which resulted in the peace of that name (Jan.
The school had languished since the death of its founder and first head, Martin Planta (1727-1772), and von Salis hoped to revive it by reconstituting it as a "Philanthropin" under Bahrdt's management.
Anyway, I was lucky it was a low cliff and that Yancey found me before a bear did.
The men guffawed until Davis's voice broke in, low and steady.
All were silent or talked in low tones.
As soon as the mother entered the house, he pocketed the phone, scaled the fence at a low corner, crossed to the surprised boy in a few steps, and placed a rag over his face.
The car was six years old now, but it was in good shape and still had low mileage.
The Black God growled low in his chest, an inhuman sound.
In his day, Shakespeare was low-brow entertainment for the common class.
A low rumble brought her attention to the horizon.
This time they started out heading west, into a maze of arroyos and low brush.
His chuckle was low and soft.
Just then a loud cackling was heard outside; and, when a servant threw open the door with a low bow, a yellow hen strutted in.
They were running low on water, so it was a dry camp.
Across the lake, the beginning glow of from the late summer sun broke through the low clouds, signaling an end to the rain.
"If I didn't love you, you'd be dead, kiri," he spoke at long last, his low, even voice terrifying Bianca.
Testing her ankle in a pair of low heels, she nodded silent approval and hurried down the hall.
Al Farra bowed low, but said nothing; and the caliph went on.
A medallion of Homer hangs on the wall of my study, conveniently low, so that I can easily reach it and touch the beautiful, sad face with loving reverence.
Did I tell you in my last letter that I had a new dress, a real party dress with low neck and short sleeves and quite a train?
The best works of art are the expression of man's struggle to free himself from this condition, but the effect of our art is merely to make this low state comfortable and that higher state to be forgotten.
The low shrub oak plateau to which the opposite shore arose stretched away toward the prairies of the West and the steppes of Tartary, affording ample room for all the roving families of men.
May I? he added in a low voice so as not to disturb the vicomte who was continuing his story.
"He's a low fellow, say what you will," remarked Prince Hippolyte.
House rent, provisions, clothing, are all very dear, and more than counterbalance the lowness of rates.
But the lowness of stature extends to the lower animals - cattle, horses, donkeys, &c. - and this may indicate that climatic causes have some part in the matter also, though Sergi denies this.
Their primary object being the development and peopling of the land, they have naturally been made as cheaply as possible; and as in such cases the cost of the land is inconsiderable, economy has been sought by the use of lighter and rougher permanent way, plant, rolling stock, &c. Such railways are not " light " in the technical sense of having been made under enactments intended to secure permanent lowness of cost as compared with standard lines.
The lowness of the coast causes a series of large lagoons, the chief of which are those of Bages et Sigean, Gruissan, Lapalme and Leucate.
 in., and this, with the lowness of its freeboard, caused the vessel to be called the "Yankee cheesebox on a raft."
The lowness of the figures regarding women is to be noticed throughout.
It has been supposed that because the surface of the young leaves is small transpiration is correspondingly feeble; but it must be remembered, not only that their newlyformed tissue is unable without an abundant supply of sap from the roots to resist the excessive drying action of the atmosphere, but that, in spring, the lowness of the temperature at that season in Great Britain prevents the free circulation of the sap. The comparative dryness of the atmosphere in spring also causes a greater amount of transpiration then than in autumn and winter.
Lowness of price has not been the only factor in increasing the rate of consumption.
The rivers are the great highways of communication, but, in consequence of the lowness of the water between October and May, navigation is then only possible for shallow draught stern-wheel steamers and launches.
"Theirs was a crime which it would never have entered into the heart of any man to commit who was not raised above the lowness of the ordinary criminal."
The rapidity of the tides in this inlet, and the lowness of its shores, which are generally indistinct on account of mist from a moderate offing, render this the most difficult portion of the navigation of the east coast of England
If the smallpox and polio successes were achieved in a low-tech world, think how much more we can accomplish with vastly improved tools, infrastructure, and communication.
Quinn, absent Howie, was just another low level scientist.
We're supposed to lay low and avoid vamps.
It was low and gravelly with an edge of huskiness.
He stood before the low-burning fire, golden eyes swirling as he thought quickly.
"There is a man you will meet when you are older, a man who-- " "This is low, even for you," a second man's voice said.
Morning dawned with low-hanging clouds.
Several times his head dropped low as if it were falling and he dozed off.
His laugh was low, and she could imagine his mocking expression.
Evidently accustomed to managing debates and to maintaining an argument, he began in low but distinct tones:
Beside him sat Uvarov, who with rapid gesticulations was giving him some information, speaking in low tones as they all did.
Rostov, knitting his brows, left the room with another low bow.
The second broadsheet stated that our headquarters were at Vyazma, that Count Wittgenstein had defeated the French, but that as many of the inhabitants of Moscow wished to be armed, weapons were ready for them at the arsenal: sabers, pistols, and muskets which could be had at a low price.
From the fleches they rode still farther to the left, along a road winding through a thick, low-growing birch wood.
But as if this angered him, he bent his head quite low and muttered:
All he saw about him merged into a general impression of naked, bleeding human bodies that seemed to fill the whole of the low tent, as a few weeks previously, on that hot August day, such bodies had filled the dirty pond beside the Smolensk road.
"Now then, you foxes!" said another, laughing at some militiamen who, stooping low, entered the battery to carry away the wounded man.
"There is a man you will meet when you are older, a man who-- " "This is low, even for you," a second man's voice said.
"Are you bowing to a friend, eh?" remarked another, chaffing a peasant who ducked low as a cannon ball flew over.
De Beausset bowed low, with that courtly French bow which only the old retainers of the Bourbons knew how to make, and approached him, presenting an envelope.
Had known what it was to be flush, grew low-spirited toward the.
Raoul returned to the inn feeling very weary, very low-spirited and very sad.
why, she understands that her master’s come home, and that he’s low-spirited.
The symptoms of Natasha’s illness were that she ate little, slept little, coughed, and was always low-spirited.
Wopsle's great-aunt's sitting-room and bedchamber—being but faintly illuminated through the agency of one low-spirited dip-candle and no snuffers.
The best fun was with Madame Joubert: Miss Wilson was a poor sickly thing, lachrymose and low-spirited, not worth the trouble of vanquishing, in short; and Mrs.
In addition to the fact that his rheumatism was exceptionally bad, he felt unusually low-spirited this morning; the gloomy weather and the prospect of a long day of ladder work probably had something to do with it.
Argentines have been in low spirits lately because of a deep recession.
The others drive back to Pasadena in low spirits the next day.
After a tearful farewell, the players were in low spirits in practice Tuesday.
Cox spent the last month of the campaign in Washington in low spirits.
She returns to her Massachusetts home in low spirits.
In the Decepticon headquarters everyone is in low spirits.
Morris wrote to a friend : " I am in low spirits about the prospects of our party, if I can dignify a little knot of men by such a word.
With Kong Le's Forces Arm?s Neutralistes-FAN ( Neutralist Armed Forces ) blocking Route 7 at Muang Soui, the Lao communist supply line was interdicted, and they were short of supplies and in low spirits.
Cambodia's 50th independence day finds its king in low spirits, given to calling his country a " beggar state " and a " jungle . . . populated more and more by wild beasts ."
"One Pattern " was recorded under a strenuous schedule by a P-Model in low spirits, with Hirasawa having his vision heavily imposed on by various circumstances, and he has since called this his least favorite P-Model album.
This lugubrious work of art was set up in white marble after his death in St Paul's cathedral, where it may still be seen.
Very near his end he had the lugubrious curiosity to cause the coffins of his embalmed ancestors to be opened at the Escorial.
Boris sketched two trees in the album and wrote: "Rustic trees, your dark branches shed gloom and melancholy upon me."
"Comfortable. Just like an old slipper," he replied, with just a hint of melancholy in his voice.
Also, there are some genuine flashes of pop genius here, albeit somewhat melancholy ones.
He devised the Kensington System, under which she spent, to use her own words, her "rather melancholy childhood."
His nature was timid, lethargic and melancholy, and his court was not marked by the scandals which had been seen under Henry IV.
Yet farewell of so famous a house should not be made with so melancholy a story.
The death by small-pox of his favourite child was followed by that of his wife, who, long a prey to melancholy, was on the 3rd of July carried off by typhus.
But what he failed to give, Ewald supplied, and if more of De Wette's than of Ewald's work still stands to-day, that is but an illustration of the melancholy fact that in history negative criticism is surer than positive construction.
As the poet of love he gives utterance to the pensive melancholy rather than to the pleasures associated with it.
A deep melancholy took possession of him, and gave a dark tinge to all his views of human nature and of human destiny.
Coleridge seemed to him to be ineffectual as a philosopher, and personally to be a melancholy instance of genius running to waste.
Their mythology so far as we know it, has a melancholy and mystic tone, and their religion partakes of the same character.
Just as Boris' leave of absence was expiring, Anatole Kuragin made his appearance in Moscow, and of course in the Karagins' drawing room, and Julie, suddenly abandoning her melancholy, became cheerful and very attentive to Kuragin.
There was a melancholy mood by the river.
Another element in his character discovered itself when in 180r he mounted the throne over the body of his murdered father: a mystic melancholy liable at any moment to issue in extravagant action.
Many ideas and expressions of the Sicilian have been reproduced by the Roman poet; and the same tone of impassioned solemnity and melancholy seems to have pervaded both works.
The melancholy of the song is a hint of the Joni circa Urge For Going period.
I can't help wondering whether I am alone in feeling melancholy at the ruin of Blunkett.
Wise and generally melancholy reflections on human nature and political society are not infrequent in his writings, and they arise naturally and incidentally out of the subject he is discussing.
My face grew grave, and Agatha became melancholy.
The longest track at 10:10, "Suddenly," has a slightly melancholy country feel.
Anna Pavlovna remarked with a melancholy smile that Kutuzov had done nothing but cause the Emperor annoyance.
His over-emotional nature passed rapidly from one phase of feelirg to another; but the more melancholy moods predominated.
It was a melancholy, asymmetric ballad, and reminded me of British jazz from the 1960s.
Cease to look so melancholy, my dear master; you shall not be left desolate, so long as I live.
The sorrows of his country and his own physical sufferings have communicated a melancholy tone to the writings of Krasinski, which read like a dirge, or as if the poet stood always by an open grave - and the grave is that of Poland.
The affianced couple, no longer alluding to trees that shed gloom and melancholy upon them, planned the arrangements of a splendid house in Petersburg, paid calls, and prepared everything for a brilliant wedding.
On the day of John Wesley's death the preachers in London sent a brief note to those stationed in the country: "Dear Brother, The melancholy period we have so long dreaded is now arrived.
He is very melancholy with Mademoiselle Karagina, said Pierre.
Oddly, the sound seemed more melancholy than menacing.
This melancholy, which did not prevent her amusing herself, did not hinder the young people who came to her house from passing the time pleasantly.
His early studies were directed chiefly to morbid anatomy.
Morbid anatomy now became a recognized branch of medical research, and the movement was started which has lasted till our own day.
Again, besides giving us the clue to the nature of many diseases and to the continuity of many morbid series, by bacteriology certain diseases, such as actinomycosis, have been recognized for the first time.
On the other hand, Gustavus had his full share of the family failings of irritability and suspiciousness, the latter quality becoming almost morbid under the pressure of adverse circumstances.
In anatomy and physiology little advance had been made, and so of pathology in the sense of an explanation of morbid processes or knowledge of diseased structures there could be very little.
Moreover, the insight into origins, into initial morbid processes revealed by the pathologists, eu Theraa woke more and more the hoe of dealin with the peutics.
Truer conceptions of normal psychology have transformed for us those of the morbid - P. Pinel (1745-1826), Griesinger, Henry Maudsley (b.
Young Ebenezer, although one of a large family, had a solitary and rather morbid childhood.
The adjective "synechological" is used in the same general sense; "synechology" is a theory of continuity or universal causation; "synechia" is a term in ophthalmology for a morbid union of parts.
From the very beginning of his reign Eric's morbid fear of the upper classes drove him to give his absolute confidence to a man of base origin and bad character, though, it must be admitted, of superior ability.
Its continued employment may, indeed, so injure the mucous membrane of the stomach as to interfere with digestion and so cause a morbid and dangerous reduction in weight.
It is in this department, from its abstruseness and complexity, that we should expect the advance of anatomy and physiology - normal and morbid - to be most delayed.
1844) and others to reveal the minute anatomy of the nervous centres; while the discrimination of tissues and morbid products by stains, as in the silver and osmic acid methods, and in those known by the names of Carl Weigert or Marchi, had scarcely begun.
The cells met with in morbid parts which are in a state of active vitality are built up of the same components as those Structure of found in normal tissues (Pl.
James Hope (1801-1841) and Peter Mere Latham (1789-1875) further developed this subject, and the former was also known for his researches in morbid anatomy.
A plant may be diseased as a whole, because nearly all its tissues are in a morbid or pathological condition, owing to some Fungus pervading the wholee.g.
Broussais's system, to which he gave the name of "Medecine physiologique," did much indirect good, in fixing attention upon morbid changes in the organs, and thus led to the rise of the strongly opposed anatomical and pathological school of Corvisart, Laennec and Bayle.
The signs of these morbid states were to be found in the general constitution of the body, especially in the excretions.
Joseph Skoda (1805-1881) extended, and in some respects corrected, the art of auscultation as left by Laennec. Karl Rokitansky (1804-1878), by his colossal labours, placed the science of morbid anatomy on a permanent basis, and enriched it by numerous discoveries of detai
Mere enlargement of an organ does not imply that it is in a state of hypertrophy, for some of the largest organs met with in morbid anatomy are in a condition of extreme atrophy.
And museum of morbid anatomy, and was fusing these gains in the laboratory so as to claim for itself, as a special branch of science by virtue of peculiar concepts, its due place and provision - provision in the establishment of chairs and of special laboratories for its chemical and biological subdivisions - clinical medicine, by the formal provision of disciplinary classes, was illustrating the truth of the experience that teaching and research must go hand-in-hand, the one reinforcing the other: that no teacher can be efficient unless he be engaged in research also; nay, that for the most part even the investigator needs the encouragement of disciples.
By a combination of these morbid predispositions with the action of deleterious influences from without all diseases were produced.
The symptoms of disease were explained as efforts of the soul to rid itself from morbid influences, the soul acting reasonably with respect to the end of self-preservation.
The disorders of the 14th century, however, the numerous earthquakes, and the Black Death, which had spread over the greater part of Europe, produced a condition of ferment and mystic fever which was very favourable to a recrudescence of morbid forms of devotion.
In England the first important name in this field is at the same time that of the first writer of a systematic work in any language on morbid anatomy, Matthew Baillie (1761-1823), a nephew of John and William Hunter, who published his treatise in 1795.
In the case of Laennec himself this qualification takes nothing from his fame, for he studied so minutely the relations of post-mortem appearances to symptoms during life that, had he not discovered auscultation, his researches in morbid anatomy would have made him famous.
The same morbid and abnormal trance utterances recur in Christian revivals in every age, e.g.
The same scientific bent is seen in the greater attention paid to morbid anatomy (which dates from Baillie) and the more scientific method of studying diseases.
What a morbid analogy!
Treatment of disease was directed not to any special organ, nor to producing the crises and critical discharges of the Hippocratic school, but to correcting the morbid common condition or "community," relaxing the body if it was constricted, causing contraction if it was too lax, and in the "mixed state" acting according to the predominant condition.
But a few weeks before, Mr Drummond, who was Sir Robert Peel's private secretary, had been shot dead in the street by a lunatic. In consequence of this, and the manifold anxieties of the time with which he was harassed, the mind of the great statesman was no doubt in a moody and morbid condition, and when he arose to speak later in the evening, he referred in excited and agitated tones to the remark, as an incitement to violence against his perso
The wind blew the entire night, creaking and groaning about the old building in a mournful dirge.
On the journey he was deeply affected by the mournful fate of Marie-Antoinette, and resolved to do what he could to alleviate their sufferings.
Each visitor performed the ceremony of greeting this old aunt whom not one of them knew, not one of them wanted to know, and not one of them cared about.
In 1851 he married his cousin, Mlle Valerie Feuillet, who helped him to endure the mournful captivity to which his filial duty bound him.
With mournful pleasure she now lingered over these images, repelling with horror only the last one, the picture of his death, which she felt she could not contemplate even in imagination at this still and mystic hour of night.
Drouyn de Lhuys, the French minister of foreign affairs, made his death the subject of a special despatch, desiring the French ambassador to express to the government "the mournful sympathy and truly national regret which the death, as lamented as premature, of Richard Cobden had excited on that side of the Channel."
Like the Greek drama and the mysteries of the European middle ages, it is the offspringof purely religious ceremony, which for centuries has been performed annually during the first ten days of the month Muharramthe recital of mournful lamentations in memory of the tragic fate of the house of the caliph All, the hero of the Shiitic Persians.
Like the Greek drama and the mysteries of the European middle ages, it is the offspringof purely religious ceremony, which for centuries has been performed annually during the first ten days of the month Muharramthe recital of mournful lamentations in memory of the tragic fate of the house of the caliph All, the hero of the Shiitic Persians.
The new temple heralded a new future; the mournful fasts commemorative of Jerusalem's disasters would become feasts; Yahweh had left the Temple at the fall of Jerusalem, but had now returned to sanctify it with his presence; the city had purged its iniquity and was fit once more to become the central sanctuary.
After a moment she added, mournfully, "I fear some people's lives are just like Ginger's."
Brandon Westlake, mournfully depressed, readied for Billy Langstrom's funeral while Dean wondered if Lydia Larkin might be involved in funeral plans of her own.
She sang something mournfully, addressing the queen, but the king waved his arm severely, and men and women with bare legs came in from both sides and began dancing all together.
He doesn't get that I'm not going to waste my time mourning when I can live.
I will not be offended if you choose to spend the day in mourning, my friend.
Shirts of the natives of the poorer classes, and is, when very dark, the color of mourning; therefore, women at funerals, and generall after a death, smear themselves with it.
Soon after Prince Andrew had gone, Princess Mary wrote to her friend Julie Karagina in Petersburg, whom she had dreamed (as all girls dream) of marrying to her brother, and who was at that time in mourning for her own brother, killed in Turkey.
The idea of communicating with the departed was naturally attractive even to the merely curious, still more to those who were mourning for lost friends, and most of all to those who believed that this was the commencement of a new revelation.
La Roquette, "is not alone a misfortune for England, but a cause of mourning for France and humanity."
Was this passage written when Aristotle was mourning for his friend?
He would render the verse, "In that day there shall be a great mourning in Jerusalem, as the mourning of the women who weep for Tammuz-Adon" (A don means lord).
The queen witnessed the wedding from the private pew or box of St George's Chapel, Windsor, but she wore the deep mourning which she was never wholly to put off to the end of her life, and she took no part in the festivities of the wedding.
After the battle his remains were brought to Toulon and buried in Fort La Malgue, and the revolutionary government paid tribute to his memory by a ceremony of public mourning (Sept.
11, where an allusion is seen by some to the mourning for King Josiah, slain in battle at Megiddo.
Herodotus, speaking of the sanctity in which some animals were held by the Egyptians, says that the people of every family in which a dog died shaved themselves - their expression of mourning - adding that this was a custom of his own time.
In 1893 the country, on the expiration of the royal mourning, began to take a more than usual interest in the affairs of the royal family.
A public mourning followed, which lasted six days, and Cambyses accompanied the corpse to the tomb.
Demeter, clad in black (hence µEXaiva) in token of mourning for her daughter and wrath with Poseidon, retired into a cave.
There is much that is striking and original in his history of marriage (Die ji dische Hochzeit in nachbiblischer Zeit, 1860), and of mourning customs (Die Leichenfeierlichkeiten im nachbiblischen Judenthum, 1861), his contributions to the sources of the Arabian Nights (Zur rabbinischen Sprach-und Sagenkunde, 1873), and his notes on rabbinic antiquities (Beitrage zur rabbinischen Sprachund Altertumskunde, 1893).
On the campus of the institute is a fine statue, "Virginia Mourning Her Dead," by Moses Ezekiel (b.
Especially among the lower races the dead are regarded as hostile; the Australian avoids the grave even of a kinsman and elaborate ceremonies of mourning are found amongst most primitive peoples, whose object seems to be to rid the living of the danger they run by association with the ghost of the dead.
There was a tendency in time of misfortune to revert to earlier rites (illustrated in some ancient mourning customs), and it may have been some old disused practice revived under the pressure of national distress.
In keeping with this, her festivals at Naxos present a double character; the one, full of mourning and sadness, represents her death or abandonment by Theseus, the other, full of joy and revelry, celebrates her awakening from sleep and marriage with Dionysus.
He died in Turin on the 20th of March 1894; his body was taken to Pesth, where he was buried amid the mourning of the whole.
At the funeral of men there is much mourning, the female relatives cutting or tearing their hair off and plastering their faces with clay, but for women no public ceremonies took place.
His dying boast, that "no Athenian had put on mourning through his doing," perhaps refers to his forbearance towards his political rivals, whom he refused to ruin by prosecution.
Among birds common in Texas as well as in the other Southern States are the cardinal, golden-fronted woodpecker, Mississippi kite, mourning-dove, and turkey-buzzard.
Iseult of Ireland lands to find the city in mourning for its lord; hastening to the bier, she lays herself down beside Tristan, and with one last embrace expires.
Gratitude for his achievements and sorrow for his death found expression in universal mourning wherein king and peasant equally joined.
For some time after his succession Afghanistan was in a state of anarchy, and his rebellious half-brothers overran the country while he remained at Kandahar mourning the loss of a favourite son.
He not only caused the mourning for the death of Hosain and other Shiite festivals to be celebrated at Bagdad, but also allowed imprecations against Moawiya and even against Mahomet's wife Ayesha and the caliphs Abu Bekr, Omar and Othman, to be posted up at the doors of the mosques.
Among Greeks and Arabs, mourners also cut themselves with knives and scratched their faces; the Hebrew law forbade such mourning, and we find the prohibition repeated in many canons of the Eastern churches.
The day of his burial was a day of national mourning, and rightly so, for Baross had dedicated his whole time and genius to the promotion of his country's prosperity.
The end of the period of mourning for the late king was the signal for a succession of gaieties, during which the queen displayed a passion for amusement and excitement which led to unfortunate results.
But after cremation came in a mourning procession of servants and chiefs carrying the body to the funeral pyre to be burnt by the demondressed priests, after which the crowd of wives and slaves were exhorted to serve their lord faithfully in the next world, were sacrificed and their bodies burnt.
Forbes, The Lyon in Mourning (1895-1896); Andrew Lang, Pickle, the Spy (1897), and Prince Charles Edward (1900); R.
In Spain, indeed, it became customary to close the churches altogether as a sign of mourning; but this practice was condemned by the council of Toledo (633).
See articles on mourning customs in the Bible Dictionaries, and, for special studies, Buchler, Zeit.
The Russian court went into mourning for the last of the Condes, and diplomatic relations with Paris were broken off.
The earliest form of the Grail story, the Gawain- Bleheris version, exhibits a marked affinity with the characteristic features of the Adonis or Tammuz worship; we have a castle on the sea-shore, a dead body on a bier, the identity of which is never revealed, mourned over with solemn rites; a wasted country, whose desolation is mysteriously connected with the dead man, and which is restored to fruitfulness when the quester asks the meaning of the marvels he beholds (the two features of the weeping women and the wasted land being retained in versions where they have no significance); finally the mysterious food-providing, self-acting talisman of a common feast - one and all of these features may be explained as survivals of the Adonis ritual.
Frontenac died on the 28th of November 1698 at the Château St-Louis after a brief illness, deeply mourned by the Canadian people.
All three mourned as they hovered over Jackson's lifeless body.
But none of these stories rests on trustworthy evidence; on the other hand, there can be no doubt that Aurelius trusted her while she lived, and mourned her loss.
I, 1-2), to the Septuagint version of the book (produced between 260 and 130 B.C.), in which the disputed prophecies are already found, and to the Greek translation of the Wisdom of Jesus, the son of Sirach, which distinctly refers to Isaiah as the comforter of those that mourned in Zion (Eccles.
He was on friendly terms with many who were not Jews, and was so warmly devoted to his slave Tabi that when the latter died he mourned for him as for a beloved member of his own family.
During this time Rome was horrorstruck by the mysterious murder of the young duke of Gandia, and the bereaved pope mourned his son with the wildest grief.
He died on the 26th of September 1626, mourned alike by leaders in church and state.
But if Erasmus was unlike the 18th century rationalist in that he did not declare war against the church, but remained a Catholic and mourned the disruption, he was yet a true rationalist in principle.
It is baptized and feted and mourned for like a human being at its death.
He was buried in Damascus and mourned by the whole East.
Then he wept and mourned beyond what seemed to his other followers the bounds of propriety, exclaiming that Heaven was destroying him.
And when Caesar died Suetonius notes that he was mourned by foreign nations, especially by the Jews (Caes.
After Cyzicus had been duly mourned and buried, the Argonauts proceeded along the coast of Mysia, where occurred the incident of Heracles and Hylas.
Changed by Artemis out of compassion into guinea fowls and removed to the island of Leros, where they mourned part of the year for their brother.
She was mourned at her death not by her own country only, nor even by all English-speaking people, but by the whole world.
We like him better when he mourned, as has been related, for his own mother.
Scarcely any emperor has left behind him so good a reputation; his death was mourned alike by senate and people, and even the soldiers repented and raised a monument in his honour.
The American House of Representatives adopted a motion of regret, and added to it these words: "That his loss is not alone to be mourned by the people of his native land, where his firm and constant exposition of, and devotion to, free and liberal ideas have materially advanced the social, political and economic conditions of these people, but by the lovers of liberty throughout the world."
The annual vicissitudes of the life of Sabazius, the Greek Dionysus, were accompanied by the mimic rites of his worshippers, who mourned with his sufferings and rejoiced with his joy.
This complex view of life is exemplified by Plato, whose general theory of idealism is entirely optimistic. In analysing the world of phenomena he necessarily takes a pessimistic view because phenomena are merely imitations more or less removed from reality, i.e.
In Europe on the whole the so-called pessimistic attitude was commoner in the Teutonic north than in the Mediterranean basin.
Julius Reviczky (1855-1899) also inclined to the Occidental rather than to the specifically Magyar type of poets; his lyrics are highly finished, aristocratic and pessimistic (Pan halala, " The Death of Pan ").
With Taylor's presentation of the difficulties with which morality is expected to grapple probably few would be found seriously to disagree, though they might consider it unduly pessimistic. But when he turns what is in effect a statement of certain forms of moral difficulty into an attack upon the logical and coherent character of morality itself, he is not so likely to command assent.
And the previous history of religious belief in India would tend to show that emphasis was laid on the fact, less as an explanation of the origin of evil, than as a protest against a then current pessimistic idea that salvation could not be reached on earth, and must therefore be sought for in a rebirth in heaven, in the Brahmaloka.
It is not necessary to multiply authors, as is done, for example, by Siegfried, who supposes four principal writers (a pessimistic philosopher, an Epicurean glossator, a sage who upholds the value of wisdom, and an orthodox editor) besides a number of annotators; it is sufficient to assume that several conservative scribes have made short additions to the original work.
Americans think that this statement is altogether too pessimistic. Not sufficient account had been taken of the uncultivated land in farms, and of the possibilities of improving the yield, and still further cheapening the product.
It is pessimism that says, "We are doomed."
Pessimism is naturally connected with materialist, optimism with idealist, views of life.
He started authorship with a book of verse in 1888, after which time he led a reaction against realism and pessimism, and has turned back to a rich romantic idealism in his novels of Endymion (1889) and Hans Alienus (1892), and in his stories (1897) of the time of Charles XII.
He published works on Leibnitz, empiricism and scepticism in Hume's philosophy, modern pessimism, Kantic criticism, English philosophy, Heraclitus of Ephesus and many other subjects.
He directs this spirit of revolt also against the sources of his own inspiration; he turns bitterly against Wagner, whose intimate friend and enthusiastic admirer he had been, and denounces him as the musician of decadent emotionalism; he rejects his "educator" Schopenhauer's pessimism, and transforms his will to live into a "Will to Power."
Oriental pessimism, at least as understood by Europeans, is best exemplified in Buddhism, which finds in human life sorrow and pain.
Although von Hartmann is a pessimist, his pessimism is by no means unmitigated.
The murder of Kotzebue by Karl Sand, however, shocked him out of his extreme revolutionary views, and from this time he tended, under the influence of the writings of Hamann and Herder, more and more in the direction of conservatism and romanticism, until at last he ended, in a mood almost of pessimism, by attaching himself to the extreme right wing of the forces of reaction.
Anthero de Quental, the chief of the Coimbrans, enshrined his metaphysical neo-Buddhistic ideas overshadowed by extreme pessimism, and marked the stages of his mental evolution, in a sequence of finely-wrought sonnets.
Vincenzo Gioberti published in 1843 his famous treatise Del primato morale e civile degli Italiani, a work, which, in striking contrast to the prevailing pessimism of the day, extolled the past greatness and achievements of the Italian people and their present virtues.
But even at this stage of his career the pessimism of his later writings began to manifest itself, together with a susceptibility to morbid fears which led him to keep loaded weapons always at his bedside.
After the Democratic victory of 1800, his letters, full of retrospective judgments and interesting outlooks, are but rarely relieved in their sombre pessimism by flashes of hope and courage.
Exceptional to this general rule, however, is a mood of pessimism which sometimes overtakes youths on the threshold of manhood.
Mephistopheles (1900), three studies in pessimism; T.
But we should quite misunderstand this pessimism if we held it to mean that Jeremiah saw no signs of private morality and individual spiritual convictions among his people.
Out of pantheism again pessimism develops.
The pessimism of Schopenhauer and Hartmann does not, however, exclude a certain ultimate mysticism, which bears some analogy to that of Buddhism.
Pessimism, therefore, depends upon the individual point of view, and the term is frequently used merely in a condemnatory sense by hostile critics.
Pessimism and optimism have, however, been expressed in systematic philosophical forms, a brief summary only of which need here be given.Between optimism and pessimism is the theory of "meliorism," according to which the world on the whole makes progress in goodness.
Objections to the belief in immortality have been advanced from the standpoints of materialism, naturalism, pessimism and pantheism.
Thus, though incidentally there is much to be learned from Nietzsche, especially from his criticism of the ethics of pessimism, or from the strictures he passes upon the negative morality of extreme asceticism or quietism, his system inevitably provides its own refutation.
Hence a need was soon felt e ~ of something to dispel the pessimism of the No, and that something took the form of comedies played in the interludes of the No and called Kyogen (mad words).
The advent of Christianity, with its categorical assertion of future happiness for the good, to a large extent did away with pessimism in the true sense.
To call it "pessimism" is merely to apply to it a characteristically Western principle according to which happiness is impossible without personality.
The truth of Nature is force; the truth of will is rational desire; the truth of life is neither the optimism of Leibnitz and Hegel, nor the pessimism of Schopenhauer and Hartmann, but the moderatism of Aristotle.
Generally speaking, pessimism may be found in all pantheistic and materialistic systems. It is important, however, to point out an essential distinction.
Perhaps the most characteristic example of unsystematic pessimism is the language of Ecclesiastes, who concludes that "all is vanity."
We may note at the outset the spirit of pessimism which, like the curse on the hoard, pervades the whole.
A curious antidote to the harsh pessimism of Strindberg was offered by the delicate and fantastic temperament of Ola Hansson (b.
From Alecsandri there is a natural transition to his great rival, who was also his superior in depth of thought and in mastery of form and language, the great poet of pessimism, Mihail E Eminescu (q.v.).
But the gloom of Juvenal's pessimism is unlighted by hope.
And out of the combination of these two dualisms arose the teaching of Gnosticism, with its thoroughgoing pessimism and fundamental asceticism.
Flint has dealt with the following antitheistic theories: atheism, materialism, positivism, secularism, pessimism, pantheism and (in a separate volume) agnosticism.
See James Sully, Pessimism: A History and a Criticism (1877); Caro, Le Pessimisme au xix e siecle (1878); Saltus, The Anatomy of Negation (1886); Tulloch, Modern Theories on Philosophy and Religion (1884); William James, The Will to Believe; Duhring, Der Werth des Lebens (1865); Meyer, Weltelend and Weltschmerz (1872); E.
Here follows his pessimism, like to, but differing from, that of his master.
In spite of that, Lydgate is characteristically medieval - medieval in his prolixity, his platitude, his want of judgment and his want of taste; medieval also in his pessimism, his Mariolatry and his horror of death
Strauss as the typical "Philistine of culture"; his revolt against the fashion of pessimism to demand a new and more robust affirmation of life, not merely although, but because, it is painful
" No sooner do we try to get rid of the idea of Immortality - than Pessimism raises its head ...
There is a touch of Byron, Swinburne and even of Schopenhauer in many of his rubais, which clearly proves that the modern pessimist is by no means a novel creature in the realm of philo- sophic thought and poetical imagination.
Till Amos (with the solitary exception of Micaiah ben Imlah, in i Kings xxii.) prophecy was optimist - even Elijah, if he denounced the destruction of a dynasty and the annihilation of all who had bowed the knee to Baal, never doubted of the future of the nation when only the faithful remained; but the new prophecy is pessimist - it knows that Israel is rotten to the core, and that the whole fabric of society must be dissolved before reconstruction is possible.
The average man is pessimist or optimist not on theoretical grounds, but owing to the circumstances of his life, his material prosperity, his bodily health, his general temperament.
He was indeed not at first a complete pessimist, but to be a preacher of Deuteronomy required a sanguine temper which a prophet of the school of Isaiah could not possess.
Devout and mystical to an almost morbid degree, hating revolution and distrusting Liberalism, he was a confirmed pessimist, yet he had many noble qualities: he was brave to the verge of foolhardiness, devoted to his country, and ready to risk his crown to free Italy from the foreigner.
Fred's mood remained somber throughout the meal.
"Yes," she answered in a surprisingly somber voice.
A beautiful summer day had dawned, the day on which I was to make the acquaintance of a somber and mysterious friend.
But beneath the slope, by the cart with the wounded near the panting little nag where Pierre stood, it was damp, somber, and sad.
It was a somber Felipa who met them at the airport with the driver.
Mary was odious to her Protestant subjects, Elizabeth to those of the unreformed religion, and both these queens succeeded to the crown in times of general sadness; but the youthful Queen Victoria had no enemies except a few Chartists, and the land was peaceful and prosperous when she began toreign over it.
He suddenly felt sorry for her and was vaguely conscious that he might be the cause of the sadness her face expressed.
But, though she noticed it, she was herself in such high spirits at that moment, so far from sorrow, sadness, or self-reproach, that she purposely deceived herself as young people often do.
Anna Mikhaylovna regarded the refined sadness that united her son to the wealthy Julie with emotion, and resignation to the Divine will.
The sadness in her voice chased away his mirth.
His fury, pain, and sorrow choked her.
The steady progress of the heretical movement in spite of all opposition was a cause of deep sorrow to Polycarp, so that in the last years of his life the words were constantly on his lips, "Oh good God, to what times hast thou spared me, that I must suffer such things!"
She wasn't certain what to feel: angry at Darkyn for setting her up or sorrow at facing the mate she'd never have.
In men Rostov could not bear to see the expression of a higher spiritual life (that was why he did not like Prince Andrew) and he referred to it contemptuously as philosophy and dreaminess, but in Princess Mary that very sorrow which revealed the depth of a whole spiritual world foreign to him was an irresistible attractio
This was my first great sorrow--my first personal experience with death.
Before I left New York, these bright days were darkened by the greatest sorrow that I have ever borne, except the death of my father.
"I have seen many men" (wrote Sir William Kingston, governor of the Tower) "and also women executed, and all they have been in great sorrow, and to my knowledge this lady has much joy and pleasure in death."
Her teal gaze was filled with sorrow rather than hope, but her vulnerability hooked him nonetheless.
This led to a quarrel with his son, who with quite unnecessary harshness, partly due to his minister the Marquis d'Ormea, arrested his father and confined him at Rivoli and later at Moncalieri; there Victor, overwhelmed with sorrow, died on the 31st of October 1732.
Her look of soul-deep sorrow touched him, and he recalled what he felt as a youth to find his father and mother dead and his family hunted and forced out of their own home.
Sorrow is sent by Him, not by men.
Don't imagine that sorrow is the work of men.
She was overcome by sweet sorrow and tears were already rising in her eyes; then she suddenly asked herself to whom she was saying this.
Gratitude for his achievements and sorrow for his death found expression in universal mourning wherein king and peasant equally joined.
As soon as she heard his voice a vivid glow kindled in her face, lighting up both her sorrow and her joy.
But all pain and sorrow are incidental to the human being in his individual capacity.
Next day the National Assembly issued a decree expressing their great sorrow on account of his death; and the public funeral on the 7th of July was one of the most striking spectacles of its kind.
Never, since the death of Washington, had there been in the United States such a universal expression of public sorrow and bereavement.
The only child of the marriage, a little grand-duchess, died on the 12th of May 1808; and their common sorrow drew husband and wife closer together.
Darian met her gaze, his features resolved yet tinged with the same sorrow she felt.
During the first weeks of the queen's sorrow after the battle, Gavin, with one or two colleagues of the council, acted as personal adviser, and it may be taken for granted that he supported the pretensions of the young earl.
They said: Nothing but sorrow, shame, and ruin will come of all this!
In the meantime they plundered and destroyed the flourishing cities of Mer y and Nishapur; and when Sinjar, after his escape from captivity, revisited the site of his capital he fell sick of sorrow and grief and died soon afterwards (1157).
The mass that follows, characterized by all the outward signs of sorrow proper to Passion Week, is in striking contrast with the joyous triumph of the procession.
Where the orchestra shows that Parsifal is becoming half-conscious of his quest while Kundry is beguiling him with memories of his mother, - and also during the two changes of scene to the Hall of the Grail, where the orchestra mingles the agony of Amfortas and the sorrow of the knights with the tolling of the great bells, - the polyphony is almost as dramatic as in Tristan; while the prelude and the Charfreitagszauber are among the clearest examples of the sublime since Beethoven.
She returned to Coppet, and found herself its wealthy and independent mistress, but her sorrow for her father was deep and certainly sincere.
They spoke of the war, and like everyone else unconsciously exaggerated their sorrow about it; they spoke of their last meeting--Nicholas trying to change the subject--they talked of the governor's kind wife, of Nicholas' relations, and of Princess Mary's.
He was kindly dismissed by the pope not long after, with a letter recommending him to the protection of the bishops of Tours and Angers, and another pronouncing anathema on all who should do him any injury or call him a heretic. He returned home, overwhelmed with shame and bowed down with sorrow for having a second time been guilty of a great impiety.
The queen's private life during the decade 1870-80 was one of quiet, broken only by one great sorrow when the Princess Alice died in 1878.
Anger and sorrow gave him strength.
Oriental pessimism, at least as understood by Europeans, is best exemplified in Buddhism, which finds in human life sorrow and pain.
Mademoiselle Bourienne at once began crying again and kissed that hand, speaking of the princess' sorrow and making herself a partner in it.
To Princess Mary it was strange that now, at a moment when such sorrow was filling her soul, there could be rich people and poor, and the rich could refrain from helping the poor.
He now suffered from frequent attacks of brain irritation and exhaustion, and had many causes of sorrow and disappointment.
He held her for a long moment, surprised to find her sorrow echoed in his breast at knowing she might choose to leave.Once prime minister, his personal popularity proved to be a powerful unifying influence in a somewhat heterogeneous party; and though the illness and death (August 30, 1906) of his wife (daughter of General Sir Charles Bruce), whom he had married in 1860, made his constant attendance in the House of Commons impossible, his domestic sorrow excited widespread sympathy and appealed afresh to the affection of his political followers.
Various etymologies of the name have been suggested: "without a lip" (a, xe7Xos), Achilles being regarded as a river-god, a stream which overflows its banks, or, referring to the story that, when Thetis laid him in the fire, one of his lips, which he had licked, was consumed (Tzetzes on Lycophron, 178); "restrainer of the people" (ExE -Xaos); "healer of sorrow" (axï¿½-X os); "the obscure" (connected with axXbs, "mist"); "snakeborn" (g xts), the snake being one of the chief forms taken by Thetis.
Henry, a man of deep, sincere and even rigorous piety, regarded these evils with sorrow; he associated himself definitely with the movement for reform which proceeded from Cluny, and commanded his prelates to put an end to simony and other abuses.
In the paper which he left signed, and to which he referred in answer to the questions wherewith the busy bishops plied him, he expressed his sorrow for having assumed the royal style, and at the last moment confessed that Charles had denied to him privately, as he had publicly, that he was ever married to Lucy Walters.
His wife, St Margaret, did not survive her sorrow; she died in the castle of Edinburgh.
His figure is that of a grotesque mountebank, intended to inspire joy or drive away pain and sorrow, his hideousness being perhaps supposed actually to scare away the evil spirits.
Hence what is not strictly allegorical after the fashion of the Romaunt of the Rose or Chaucer's exercises in that kind, is for the most part occasional, dealing with courtiers' sorrow and fun, with the conventional plaints on the vanity of the world and with pious ejaculation.
The curacas sorrowfully watched the gradual extinction of their people by the operation of the mita, protesting from time to time against the exactions and cruelty of the Spaniards.
The curacas sorrowfully watched the gradual extinction of their people by the operation of the mita, protesting from time to time against the exactions and cruelty of the Spaniards.
You don't have to feel sorry for me.
"I am very sorry to have made you travel so far," said he.
Mr. Cade: I'm sorry to leave you like this without proper notice, but I simply couldn't stay any longer.
I'm sorry you're not staying longer. 
I'm sorry if I offended you.
Because you are sorry for him!
I'm sorry about your car and the rest of your things, but please don't mention money.
He'd feel sorry for her and she didn't want that.
She evidently felt frightened and ashamed to have accepted charity in a house where such things could be said, and was at the same time sorry to have now to forgo the charity of this house.
They knew that it was for the army to fight, and that if it could not succeed it would not do to take young ladies and house serfs to the Three Hills quarter of Moscow to fight Napoleon, and that they must go away, sorry as they were to abandon their property to destruction.
"I'm sorry," Alex said gently.
I think she will laugh when I tell her she is a vertebrate, a mammal, a quadruped; and I shall be very sorry to tell her that she belongs to the order Carnivora.
I'm sorry about that, boy.
No matter how sorry Alex was for what happened, or how many times he apologized or tried to make up for it, he couldn't remove the hurt.
I am very sorry that Eva and Bessie are sick.
"I'm sorry baby," Carmen said, unzipping the tent and reaching inside.
"I'm sorry," she said, reaching for his arm.
I was wrong to kick the Sawhorse, and I am sorry I became angry at him.
Only I am sorry for the Emperor that he entrusts our fine army to such as he.
I'm sorry if the lab caused problems, but no one has to sleep there again, at least with Quinn's gizmos operating.
"We're the sorry ones," I answered, "for waking you up."
I'm sorry you're unhappy with my questions, but I need to know why you suddenly needed a girl after going five years without any.
The major-domo to whom these entreaties were addressed, though he was sorry for the wounded, resolutely refused, saying that he dare not even mention the matter to the count.
So that's what I'm sorry for--human dignity, peace of mind, purity, and not the serfs' backs and foreheads, which, beat and shave as you may, always remain the same backs and foreheads.
I'm sorry I'm so positive about this.
Well I'm not sorry, and I don't know why you should be.
She felt sorry for her and held out her hand with a glance of gentle inquiry.
How sorry I am that he died, and how glad I am that he is alive again!
I should be sorry to leave the regiment.
I am sorry, for I need you.
"I'm sorry," she said instantly.
I am very sorry that poor little Peregrine is dead now.
Some fellows do things just anyhow, without preparation, and then they're sorry for it afterwards.
I am sorry because they cannot see much.
I am very sorry that you are going so far away.
I will tell you what he did, and I think you will feel very sorry for the little child.
One is sorry for the husband, really....
We are sorry for you, but we're not willing.
I am sorry that you have no little children to play with you sometimes; but I think you are very happy with your books, and your many, many friends.
"Don't be foolish," advised the Tin Woodman, "or you may be sorry for it."Sorry to have troubled you; but it couldn't be helped.
I am sorry for them because they cried much.
He looked uncomfortable and his gaze shifted absently to the cabinets.
Yully looked around again, uncomfortable in the strange place without him.
"It really doesn't matter what they were when they were mortal," he assured her with an uncomfortable chuckle.
It seemed like only a few seconds before the uncomfortable feeling became nausea.
In spite of the uncomfortable sleeping accommodations and the situation, she fell asleep almost instantly.
I know you feel uncomfortable about driving my truck.
An uncomfortable silence prompted Gerald to speak again.
Their history was too personal for her to feel uncomfortable standing near-naked to a man who'd had a crush on her for a while.
Rostov had not seen him since his proposal and Sonya's refusal and felt uncomfortable at the thought of how they would meet.
"The soldiers say it feels easier without boots," said Captain Tushin smiling shyly in his uncomfortable position, evidently wishing to adopt a jocular tone.
The world faded into shadow and light then into an uncomfortable darkness, not quite sleep but not consciousness either.
There was enough room for her to raise her arms but not sit, and she leaned against the uncomfortable wall, gazing at the world spinning outside her pod.
After an uncomfortable moment, Jackson asked, "If Elisabeth was to have a child with someone the pack chose, would they allow us to raise it?"
While Dean had no desire to participate in the new and perilous sport of ice climbing, he didn't share Cynthia total perplexity at why a sane human being would even consider subjecting himself or herself to such uncomfortable danger.
She bit her lip but didn't answer, causing an uncomfortable silence.
She hesitated, growing uncomfortable in the clammy in-between place with the scary stranger.
Katie looked relieved, but Carmen's stomach took an uncomfortable lurch.
He offered no further information and she felt uncomfortable about asking.
She glanced around the kitchen, knowing she should familiarize herself before breakfast, but feeling uncomfortable about exploring so soon after her arrival.
A few more punches, and she grew too uncomfortable with him to continue.
Surely he must know that spending so much time with her might prove uncomfortable later.
She swallowed hard, uncomfortable with playing the role of judge and jury.
It was time to talk to someone, but the idea of talking to a councilor was almost as uncomfortable as talking to no one.
There's no point in being uncomfortable just so you can prove what a macho man you are.
Arthur looked very uncomfortable but his voice didn't disguise his annoyance.
Prince Andrew answered all his questions reluctantly but reasonably, and then said he wanted a bolster placed under him as he was uncomfortable and in great pain.
Carmen stopped at the corner, uncomfortable with the heat of the exchange, yet unwilling to interrupt.Then he added, Won't it be uncomfortable for you to keep a secret from her?
For a few minutes there was an uncomfortable silence at the table.
Carmen clamped her sagging jaw shut and tore her gaze from him, an uncomfortable warmth flooding her neck and face.
What Russian, reading the account of the last part of the campaign of 1812, has not experienced an uncomfortable feeling of regret, dissatisfaction, and perplexity?
Vera's remark was correct, as her remarks always were, but, like most of her observations, it made everyone feel uncomfortable, not only Sonya, Nicholas, and Natasha, but even the old countess, who--dreading this love affair which might hinder Nicholas from making a brilliant match-- blushed like a girl.
It was one of those uncomfortable moments that left her wondering if the odometer was what he was interested in.
Rostov felt so ill at ease and uncomfortable with Boris that, when the latter looked in after supper, he pretended to be asleep, and early next morning went away, avoiding Boris.
The silence was uncomfortable until he leaned down to kiss her.
He's your husband, and if you're shy, he's going to feel uncomfortable – unsure.
For a moment he looked uncomfortable... uncertain.
Each time this happened Rostov felt uncomfortable and cast down his eyes.
Every position was awkward and uncomfortable, and her burden oppressed her now more than ever because Anatole's presence had vividly recalled to her the time when she was not like that and when everything was light and gay.
Cynthia, while not as apprehensive as Edith had been, was obviously uncomfortable watching the climbers, especially from atop their precarious positions.
Well, I don't know about that, but I am uncomfortable with him.  
If thou art determined, O God, to destroy me," the unhappy Angevin exclaimed, "let my fall be gradual!"
This morning I took a bath, and when teacher came upstairs to comb my hair she told me some very sad news which made me unhappy all day.
She needed to be unhappy, he reminded himself.
The first volume of Alexander Kisfaludy's Himfy, a series of short lyrics of a descriptive and reflective nature, appeared at Buda in 1801, under the title of Kesergo szerelem (Unhappy Love), and was received with great enthusiasm; nor was the success of the second volume Boldog szerelem (Happy Love), which appeared in 1807, inferior.
Her early rages were an unhappy expression of the natural force of character which instruction was to turn into trained and organized power.
He pointed to his manuscript book with that air of escaping from the ills of life with which unhappy people look at their work.
Addresses were presented to him at Southampton, Birmingham and other towns; he was officially entertained by the lord mayor of London; at each place he pleaded the cause of his unhappy country.
He hadn't thought himself unhappy; he'd never thought about it at all.
"No. I don't expect to.  I should've sent someone after her, but … " Gabe met Rhyn's gaze and managed a smile.  The half-demon's sharp silver gaze missed nothing, even how unhappy Gabe really was.
"You were really unhappy about…" she turned and patted the tattoo on her back.
Katie must have noticed they were not satisfied with their relationship, but how could she know why they were unhappy when even they didn't know?
Reiske's first years in Leiden were not unhappy, till he got into serious trouble by introducing emendations of his own into the second edition of Burmann's Petronius, which he had to see through the press.
Towards the close of the 17th century the province began to be overrun by the Mahrattas, and in 1718 the Delhi government formally recognized their right to levy blackmail (chauth) on the unhappy population.
Similar, too, was the revelation, when freedom of speech was at last allowed, of the unhappy effect of the long divorce of the intellect of the country from any experience of practical politics.
You have no idea how unhappy, how lonely, I feel when you are like that.
Sonya was unhappy at the separation from Nicholas and still more so on account of the hostile tone the countess could not help adopting toward her.
The princesses Aline and Sophie sit whole days with me, and we, unhappy widows of live men, make beautiful conversations over our 'charpie', only you, my friend, are missing... and so on.
My mother-in-law came to me in tears and said that Helene was here and that she implored me to hear her; that she was innocent and unhappy at my desertion, and much more.
David Hume summed up his admiration for Douglas by saying that his friend possessed "the true theatric genius of Shakespeare and Otway, refined from the unhappy barbarism of the one and licentiousness of the other."
He was thinking that Prince Andrew was unhappy, had gone astray, did not see the true light, and that he, Pierre, ought to aid, enlighten, and raise him.
He had learned that as there is no condition in which man can be happy and entirely free, so there is no condition in which he need be unhappy and lack freedom.
This unhappy state of affairs was aggravated and perpetuated by the intrigues set on foot at Constantinople against successive governors of the island, the conflicts between the Palace and the Porte, the duplicity of the Turkish authorities, the dissensions of the representatives of the great powers, the machinations of Greek agitators, the rivalry of Cretan politicians, and prolonged financial mismanagement.
Our duty, my dear, is to rectify his mistake, to ease his last moments by not letting him commit this injustice, and not to let him die feeling that he is rendering unhappy those who...
Alex had done nothing to indicate he was unhappy with things the way they were now – and yet, he was definitely troubled about something.
Actually, it had been, but it wasn't an unhappy one.
Peter, by his first marriage, had a son, the unhappy cesarevich Alexius (q.v.), who figures more largely in imaginative literature than in history - a narrow-minded, obstinate, pious youth, who had no sympathy with his father's violent innovations, and was completely under the influence of the old Muscovite reactionary faction.
Abominable, unnatural as Peter's conduct to his unhappy and innocent son undoubtedly was, there is no reason to suppose that he ever regretted.
Carmen wouldn't cheat, and Gerald wouldn't intentionally take her away, but if she was unhappy enough, Carmen might leave.
Alex might be unhappy that she hadn't asked him to help – because he was working – but he'd probably be glad to know she hadn't called Gerald.
Yet again, Saul had been chosen by Yahweh to free his people from the Philistines; he had been rejected for his sins, and had suffered continuously from this enemy; Israel at his death was left in the unhappy state in which he had found it; it was the Judaean David, the faithful servant of Yahweh, who was now chosen to deliver Israel, and to the last the people gratefully remembered their debt.
So fatally were the internal affairs of that magnificent but unhappy country bound up with concerns which brought the forces of the civilized world into play.
In the midst of these unhappy surroundings religion became more inward in men of real piety and the desire grew among them to draw closer the bonds that united them to one another.
My unhappy dalliance with the public school system has blessedly come to its end. 
From the part played by Asmodeus in this story, he has been often familiarly called the genius of matrimonial unhappiness or jealousy, and as such may be compared with Lilith.
Let us grant that there is as much intellectual absurdity in acting unjustly as in denying that two and two make four; still, if a man has to choose between absurdity and unhappiness, he will naturally prefer the former; and Clarke, as we have already seen, is not really prepared to maintain that such preference is irrational.'
He then exhibits the unhappiness that results from any excess of the self-regarding impulses, bodily appetite, desire of wealth, emulation, resentment, even love of life itself; and ends by dwelling on the intrinsic painfulness of all malevolence .2 One more special impulse remains to be noticed.
He had none, but looked so unhappily and greedily at the others while they were eating!
Unhappily there arose a suspicion that his views on maritime law were not favourable to the pretensions of Venice, and this suspicion, notwithstanding all his efforts to dissipate it, together with clerical intrigues, led to his expulsion from the state.
His main purpose was to modernize and reinterpret Christianity; he says in the preface to the third edition of the book: "I have written it solely in the service of evangelical truth, to win to the truth those especially who have been most unhappily alienated from the church and its interests, in a great measure through the fault of a reactionary party, blinded by hierarchical aims."
John (Johann Bockelson) of Leiden (1510-1536) took his place and the town became the scene of the grossest licence and cruelty, until in 1535 it was taken by the besieging bishop. Unhappily the Anabaptists have always been remembered by the crimes of John of Leiden and the revelry of Munster.
The invaluable tractate De Intellectus emendatione, in which the agreement with and divergence from Descartes on the question of method could have been fully elucidated, is unhappily not finished.
Probably no examples surpass those on the west doors of Notre Dame in Paris - unhappily much falsified by restoration.
At the same time he pointed out that, Unhappily, Egyptian administration in the Sudan had been almost uniformly unfortunate.
Mus.), is, unhappily, lost.
Unhappily, on the voyage, by some mistake (accounted for in different ways), Tristan and Iseult drink the love drink, and are forthwith seized with a fatal passion each for the other.
His warning, "No nonsense, gentlemen" (Point de reveries, Messieurs), was taken in very ill part, and it was perhaps naturally, but beyond question most unhappily, the truth that the tsar's concessions only served to encourage the Poles to revolt, and to produce a strong Russian reaction against his liberal policy.
Thus he objects to the use of statistics because they favour that tendency to regard all men as mentally and morally equal which is so unhappily strong in modern times.
His work is unhappily for the greater part in the Persian language; the excellence of what he has done in Turkish makes us regret that he did so little.
Unhappily he ordered his papers to be burnt after his death, and the knowledge that such a traveller must have accumulated died with him.
But even Linnaeus could not clear himself of the confusion, and unhappily misapplied the name Meleagris, undeniably belonging to the guinea-fowl, as the generic term for what we now know as the turkey, adding thereto as its specific designation the word gallopavo, taken from the Gallopava of C. Gesner, who, though not wholly free from error, was less mistakep than some of his contemporaries and even successors.'
Unhappily for himself and for Don John he went heart and soul into all the prince's schemes.
Unhappily, however, when Lamberg arrived in Pest, Batthyany had not yet returned; the diet, on Kossuth's motion, called on the army not to obey the new commander-in-chief, on the ground that his commission had not been countersigned by a minister at Pest.
Unhappily, after the third lecture of the course, Comte had a severe attack of cerebral derangement, brought on by intense and prolonged meditation, acting on a system that was already irritated by the chagrin of domestic discomfort.
Unhappily for himself and for Spain, he wanted the singleness of purpose required by a ruler who would devote himself to organization, and also the combination of firmness with temper needed for dealing with his nobles.
For Gladstone, in framing his budget, had contemplated a continuance of peace, and the country was, unhappily, already drifting into war.
The establishment in England of the Register of qualified practitioners and of the General Medical Council (in 1858) did something, however imperfectly, to give unity to the profession, unhappily bisected by "the two colleges"; and did much to organize, to strengthen and to purify medical education and qualification.
Unhappily for Spain, Charles, after some hesitation, decided to transmit the Netherlands to his son, and not to allow them to go with the empire.
Didymus, writing in the year 60, made the first step towards establishing this pleasant-sounding scale upon a mathematical basis, by the discovery of the lesser tone; but unhappily he placed it in a false position below the greater tone.
Unhappily, despite its warm assurances of American friendship, this document met with a most hostile reception in Italy, where it was interpreted as an attempt to undermine the position of her spokesmen and so mete out to her a different measure from that prescribed by France and Britain.
We are unhappily unable to identify any other of the principal buildings (N).
Unhappily the exertion of directing so many consecutive performances seems to have been too much for the veteran master's strength, for towards the close of 1882 his health began to decline rapidly.
This decision (passed with only one dissentient voice, but that unhappily Stephen Radic, the peasant leader) took formal effect on Dec. 1, when Prince Alexander, at the formal request of 24 delegates from Zagreb, proclaimed the union and repeated their cry " Long live free and united Yugoslavia."
Unhappily, his vigorous frame was already stricken with disease, and, after a lingering illness, he died at Marburg, on the 23rd of November 1875, diligent to the end.
Unhappily, they had no experience of affairs; and they were perfectly ready to make a constitution for Spain.
Unhappily for England and for himself, Warwicks loyalty was not sufficient to restrain his ambition and his resentment.
Unhappily, the king could not understand Pitts higher qualities, his bold confidence in the popular feeling, and his contempt for corruption.
Unhappily, too, his earliest relations with Pitt involved a dispute on a point on which he was right and Pitt was wrong.
His mother, Rachael Fawcett (Faucette), of French Huguenot descent, married when very young a Danish proprietor of St Croix, John Michael Levine, with whom she lived unhappily and whom she soon left, subsequently living with James Hamilton; her husband procured a divorce in 1759, but the court forbade her remarriage.'
Of later times there are Droplaug's Sons' Saga (997-1007), written probably about I i io, and preserved in the uncouth style of the original (a brother's revenge for his brother's death is the substance of it; Brandkrossa pattr is an appendix to it), and the tales of Thorstein Hall of Side's Son (c. 1014) and his brother Thidrandi (c. 996), which belong to the cycle of Hall o' Side's Saga, unhappily lost; they are weird tales of bloodshed and magic, with idyllic and pathetic episodes.
Unhappily, clinging to the conviction that all the lands which the crusaders would traverse were the "lost provinces" of his empire, he induced the crusaders to do him homage, so that, whatever they conquered, they would conquer in his name, and whatever they held, they would hold by his grant and as his vassals.
Of still wider interest are the accounts of Cook's three famous voyages, though unhappily much of the information gained by the naturalists who accompanied him on one or more of them seems to be irretrievably lost: the original observations of the elder Forster were not printed till 1844, and the valuable collection of zoological drawings made by the younger Forster still remains unpublished in the British Museum.
Asceticism is thus the counterpart of medieval mysticism; and, by his example as well as by his teaching in such passages, St Bernard unhappily encouraged practices which necessarily resulted in self-delusion.
He cuts and saws the solid pond, unroofs the house of fishes, and carts off their very element and air, held fast by chains and stakes like corded wood, through the favoring winter air, to wintry cellars, to underlie the summer there.
Over-transpiration in bright wintry weather, when the roots are not absorbing, often results in yellowing.
Ancient writers spoke of all these Gauls as Cimbri, and identified them with the Cimmerians of earlier date, who in Homeric times dwelt on the ocean next to the Laestrygones, in a region of wintry gloom, but where the sun set not in summer.
This communicates with the upper valley of the Sangro by a level plain called the Piano di Cinque Miglia, at an elevation of 4298 ft., regarded as the most wintry spot in Italy.
Mar's highlanders began to desert; his council was a confusion of opinions and discontents, and when, after many dangers and in the worst of health, James joined the Jacobites at Perth, it was only to discourage his friends by his gloom, and to share their wintry flight before Argyll to Montrose.
He has had his reward, for assuredly the portrait of St Louis, from the early collection of anecdotes to the last hearsay sketch of the woeful end at Tunis, with the famous enseignement which is still the best summary of the theoretical duties of a Christian king in medieval times, is such as to take away all charge of vulgarity or mere commerage from Joinville, a charge to which otherwise he might perhaps have been exposed.

